GRINNELL COLLEGE

CARLET 8c BLACK

THE STUDENT
NEWSPAPER

 

Vol. LXXVI

Grinnell. lowa. Friday. April ll. 1%?

No. 2i

 

’ Faculty Approves Mot

 

Photo By Dawn LINDBLOM

DEMONSTRATORS lined the hallway of the Science building at the last
faculty meeting to protest the present ROTC status on campus.

Protest note at Facility Meeting

i00 Wear Armbands
’Spy,’ Swastika Found

More than 100 students donned black
armbands and held a peaceful demon-
stration in the Science Bldg. before last
Monday's faculty meeting.

SGA President Tom Thomas, who was
among these gathered in the front hall
or the building, called the group's ac-
tions “a demonstration of support for
withdrawing academic credit from
ROTC."

Others in the crowd indicated that
they opposed the presence of the mili-
tary on campus entirely.

The demonstrators lined the hallways
near the front door and watched as
faculty members passed them to enter
the meeting in a lecture room. During
the meeting the faculty voted to recom~
mend withdrawal of credit from ROTC
and to set up a committee to review
the ROTC program in detail.

Some of the students carried signs
protesting the college’s accredidation of
ROTC courses and questioning the pro-
gram’s compatability with liberal arts
values.

One sign readi “if ROTC gets credit,
why not SDS?” Another placard had
only the word “LIFE” drawn on it.

Sophomore Ted Glick stood at the
front door and offered armbands to pr0<
fessors as they entered. The crowd ap-
plauded as about twelve professors ac-
cepted the armbands and put them on.
Several others were hissed when they
refused the armbands.

The students conversed and joked with
each other as they mingled in the hall-
way. Some played with the two dogs

DEMONSTRATION—
_(Coutlnued on Page 12, Column 1) y

Weston West Elected

Ernest T. Weston, president of CBS,
was elected president of the Council
of House Presidents (Coil-1P), and Jane
West became the new president of AWS,
in Tuesday afternoon’s election attended
by 63% of all women and 53% of men.
Jane West, running as a writein candi-
date, entered the race later than any of
the candidates. Her immediate reason
was “to give the campus an alternative
to voting for the one person who has
signed up."

The AWS — CoiHP candldacies were
marked by a reevaluation of the impor-
tance of AWS and Com? in the light of
the earlier referendum on abolishing
SGA which was defeated a month ago.
Weston, Mike Penzer and Bruce Nissen,
running for com? and Sally Hamann
and Jane West, for AWS president all
saw the position as a connection between
the Senate, the Student Affairs Commit-
tee, and the dorms. Weston stated at in-
formal discussion session on Saturday
night. “Grinnell can serve as a vehicle
for the President, the faculty, and the
trustees. . .COIHP should be something
that every student can use as a means
to his own benefit." Weston, a Gary, ind.
sophomore, wanted the council to reflect
upon the needs of individuals and
groups in halls.

Write-in candidate Jane West, a junior
from Springfield, Mo. was interested in
"a more academic, as opposed to pre
dominantly social outlook” in her cams
paign, and shared a concern with AWS'
communication with students with Sally
Hamann. Both candidates also agreed
that the Sex Education lecture series
should be continued. Hamann was inter-
ested in promoting “education within
the dorms” such as the dinners held in
Main for professors. Jane West won by
I 24% margin.

on to End notc Credit

Form Committee lot “Detailed Review,"
Final Recommendation Will go o Trustees

By MICHAEL BRANDON
Air Force ROTC courses will no longer receive academic
credit at Grinnell if a motion passed Monday by the faculty meets
with the approval of President Glenn Legge’tt and the Board of

Trustees.

0n the close vote of 47-40 (with 6 absten-
tions) the faculty passed the lollowlng
motion:

“(Resolved) that, eiteetivc Septem-

her 1, 1970, Grinnell College (will)

no longer grant academic credit for
participation in AFROTC courses.“

The motion to withdraw ROTC credit
was made by History professor Gregory
Gurolf at a March 10 faculty meeting,

Before passage on Monday, the motion
was amended to postpone the date of ef-
lectlveness until next year at the sug-
gestion of faculty chairman Joseph F.
Wall (History).

Wall later explained to the 58:13 that
the amendment would enable students
presently enrolled in the ROTC pro<
gram to receive credits they may need
to graduate.

Due to the wording of the motion, in-
coming students this fall might be able
to enroll in ROTC courses and receive
credit for two semesters, Wall said.

After Completing action on the first
motion, the faculty on a voice vote ap-
proved the following motion made by
Professor James D. Kissane (English);

“(Resolved) that the faculty (will)

lnstniet its chairman to appoint a

committee to review in detail the

AFROTC program at Grinnell and to

report to the faculty so that it may

make, by the time of the next regular
trustees meeting (June 1), recom-
mendations to the President and
the Board of Trustees concerning
the continuance or termination of the

College’s contract with the AF-

ROTC.”

On Tuesday Professor Wall appointed
tour professors to the committee estab-
lished by the Kissane motion. They
are Prolessors Karl DeLong (Biology),
William S. Vanderpool (Sp. 8: Tin),
Neal A. Milner (Pol. Sci), and Kissane,
’who will act as chairman. The commit-
tee has not yet met nor does it know
what approach it will take in consider-
ing the status of ROTC at Grinnell.

“The Klssane motion has the effect of

$2

Arraignment Set

In “Playboy” Case

The eight Grinnell students who alleg-
edly disrobed during a lecture by a re-
presentative of Playboy magazine in
Gates Hall on Feb. 5 will be arraigned in
Montezuma on April 14.

The students, who are charged with
“indecent exposure,” will appear before
Judge R. G. Yoder in Poweshiek County
District Court.

Charges against a ninth student were
dismissed at a preliminary hearing in
Grinnell on March 26.

Indecent exposure is an indictable
misdemeanor under iowa law carrying
a penalty of six months imprisonment or.
a $200 fine.

putting the first motion in limbo," latest.
dent Leggett believes.

“Although the first motion made it
clear that the majority of the faculty,
have expressed opposition to credit in
the present program, some might change
their minds" alter the committee makes
its recommendation, he said.

Leggett speculated that the committee
might recommend greater power of fa.
culty review over ROTC courses and
grant credit only to certain courses or
grant some sort of concurricular credit.

Asked if he personally opposed the
presence of the military at Grinnell,
Leggett replied, “Not at this time.”

Who would have the final say on wheth.
er or not ROTC will receive credit is iiol
completely clear, One section of the
bylaws of the trustees delegates to the
faculty the power to “cooperate with the
President in making the educational pas
licies of the college. . .”

Another section of the bylaws states
that “Initiative in the t . . abolition of
departments or divisions shall be in the
hands of the President,” who may ask
the faculty for an expression of opinion.

However, the bylaws state,: Final
authority shall rest in the board."

Leggett indicated that he will coopc
erate with the faculty in making a re-
commendation to the trustees concern-
ing the ROTC program.

“However, i have the right to take A
parallel recommendation to the trus<
tees," Leggett explained.

The President said that he has never
disagreed in the past with the faculty on
major recommendations to the Board oi
Trustees. The trustees usually abide by
the recommendations sent to them by the
president and faculty, Leggett said.

A removal of credit from ROTC would
not necessarily constitute a breach of the
contract the college has with the Air
Force, In the contract, the college agrees
“to grant appropriate academic credit
applicable toward graduation for the
successful completion of courses offered
by the Dept. of Aerospace Studies."

Wall told the 5&3 that an Air Force 02¢
ficer indicated last year that “no credit"
could be considered “appropriate."

Under the terms of the contract thd
agreement between Grinnell and the
Air Force "may be terminated at the
completion of any school year by either
party, by giving at least one year's no<
tlce, or sooner by mutual agreement."

The contract states that "the secretary
of the Air Force will prescribe the course
content, conduct of the courses, and pro-
vide the support literature for the . . a
curriculum.”

USAF Lt, Colonel Jack M. Steger‘
Professor of Aerospace Studies at Grin-
nell, said that he wasn't surprised by th
faculty decision to withdraw credit from
ROTC.

“i more or less expected that I

DECISION—
_(Continued on Page 5, Column 4),

 

Page Two SCARLET AND BLACK ' April ll. I969
EM

talk of the town

EDITORIALS

Censorship is a “Four Letter” Word

Turner’s (ear campaign, instigated to clean up and punish the minds and hearts
of the obscene younger generation, has iinally reached the Scarlet and Black. The
Newton Daily News, the printer for the Sim, refused tcl publish a direct quote irom
a Black Panther discussion made in a pllblic speech held at Grinnell, which contain-
ed a “four letter” word. (Actually it has 12 letters.) The printer can be held libelous
Ior printing ObscenitiesY and for this we respect his Stand. However, why should this
he thought an obscenity?

Unlortunately, due to the high level of energy expended in lowa over decency,
the Newton News ls more sensitive than it need be about what is actually obscene,
It appears that outside forces have tremendous power to create such tear, which
results in reducing freedom of expression.

Iowa’s ianatic desire ior decency smacks oi the McCarthy era, when wltehrhunts
for communists were conducted in the name of freedom, but resulted in the destruc-
tion of tllat freedom. The Newton News has reason to be sensitive for they can never
be sure that their paper won’t be the next “witch" prosecuted in the name of de
cency.

This kind of censorship is a frightening phenomenon, for free communication is
being threatened in the name oi goodness and motherhood, something hard to iight.
one or the newspaper’s tunctions is to make clear what is happening in society. The
changing approach of the Black movement and the changing expression or Black
attitudes, ior example, are very much what is happening, and as such the press must
communicate that. Language, the medium (or much or what is happening, must be
properly represented. This is not done {or the sake of sensationalism, but for an ac-
curate expression or today’s reality.

The 5&B‘s censorship is inexcusable because it is obstructing expression that is
vital to the news. It is inexcusable because the statement Censored was not obscene.
It is inexcusable because it is Closermindedness parading as righteousness. it is in-
excusable because lt ls indecency disguised as decency. It is obscene. SK.

When Enough is Not Enough

Last Monday, the iaculty took an important iirst step toward terminating the
presence of the military on campus by passing a resolution to discredit ROTC,
starting in September, 1970. The resolution passed, but we must stress the iact that
the issue was not resolved.

The iaculty in eiiect declared ROTC incompatible with Grinnell College only ior
reasons or educational philosophy, while the moral question implied in the resolu-
tion was disappointingly skirted. This is not. only a passive fiddling around while the
city burns, it is also, by virtue ot the iact that Grinnell’s military appendage still
provides the world with potential corpses and/or killers, an active fueling at those
fires. i-low painiully insuiiicient it will be to say when our boys have killed and
died, "Ah yes, but Grinnell gave them no credit ior their training.”

The second resolution, which provided for 3 committee to re-examine the entire
relationship at ROTC to the college, seems a result of the intellectual‘s inability to
take direct action, The power and goals oi that committee are also disturbing: They
could recommend to reverse the action that has already been taken, or recommend
to completely remove ROTC irom the campus. But the necessary evaluation
of ROTC should already have been completed. Action is necessary. Procrastination
in the form at this committee is an unfortunate statement oi Grinnell's lack of what,
in less iortunate circles than our own, might be called “guts."

Both situations make it imperative that students and concerned human beings
maintain an active interest in the matter,

Let’s not be satisﬁed with haltrmeasures that are so Weak they could be
reversed in a months time. Let's not let this week's iaculty action assuage our
consciences, We must not let It be said that in The Time Of The Bombs, Grinneil
College calmly erected a few defensive parasols gaily decorated with colors of intel-
lectual sell-satisfaction. The issue has not been resolved. We hope that no one on
this campus Will be content unlil it. is resolved, and Grinnell's complicity Wlth the
military comes to an end.

Sorry . . . But, Why Hide?

Last Friday’s iaeulty meeting was surreptitiously attended by a noniaculty,
outside investigator, Tlle 5&8 would like to iormally apologize to Mr. Wall and
the iaculty ior lhis less than straight-lorward action. We realize it was contrary
to the principles ot tree communication and understanding, the goals oi the news
paper, and studentriaculty relations. We hope this action will not lessen any trust
or desire to communicate that may exist between students and faculty,

There is no justilication tor a lack oi communication between elements on our
small campus. For that reason, although our uninvited attendance was wrong, the
closed nature of iaculty meetings which necessitated this action is also wrong.
Complete understanding cannot be gained when the important debate that the
iaculty does occasionally engage in cannot be heard by interested students.

The taculty certainly should not have anything to hide train students nor should
it be made so uncomfortable by the presence oi students that it is unable to express
its opinions treely. it this is the case, then perhaps the presence oi students would
be a good teaching device to assist iacnlty in developing poise in public speaking
and /or honest expression.

The iaculty cannot expect to remain on their pedagogical pedestals when dealing
with student ailans by closing the door on students seeking reasonable under-
standing. A step toward improved student-faculty communication, consisting oi
one opening oi faculty meetings, would be a step toward a more balanced relatlon—
ship between student and iaculty. The pedestal is not an effective position lrom
which to either teach or be taught. s. K.

L .

BENI, NEPAL

0n the white peaks the wind curls
up the snow,

Blows solar prominenccs, ieaihers,
rolling smoke,

Plumes of snow flowers.

Far below the black river rushes
through jungle cllasms

,

 

Where men strive Wlth the monsters
0' heat and dust,

or sun, oi sweat and burning ilesh.

But here are bllltcrcups,

And his growing in candlesticks oi
hillsides.

MITCHELL KAMEN
Oct. 17, 1966, NY. Times

By FREDRICKA NELSON
on the top of my head, a few things
that we love about lowa, inllowed by the
story of our caster Sunday picnic to red
rock damr loved things and people:
douald kaul’s excellent Writing for the
register, which hits the soul lightly out
of the existential dilemna with humor
and broadly ranging interests; the way
early spring days are only born aiter
long, grey mornings that we share with
pains; the dairy queen's wildrmountain-
blackberry malts and chocolate dipped
cones that are back in season.
scott and niki stopped by the apart-
ment aiter lunch sunday and we started
to plan where to go for our excu n.
being a native of the state is a great
advantage in planning picnics, since
sometime in your past you visited a dit-
ierent park tor each special summer
holiday. there's memorial day, father’s
day and coincident tamily birthdays,
the tourth oi iuly and hot august sun-
days when you have got to go swim~
ming or die. just last spring a group oi
us who lived in and around pine tree
(now trench house) took a bus down to
lieomah state park, to get there you
go down 146 to cskaloosa and take a left
in iront oi the town newspaper building,
which is recognizable by its english halt
timbered top story. keomah is approxi-
mately ten miles out of town and there
are road signs to help you iind the
place. it was drained last year and i‘m
not sure it the water is back up yet, but
the camp sites are heavily forested and
hilly — in general very tine and pri-
vate.
since we had Visited keomah before.
we decided on red rock dam for last
aunday. there was some debate be-
tween pallsades kepler, which is some-
where near cedar rapids, and red rock,
but the afternoon had a good head start
on us and we chose the latter. red rock
was written up in the Sunday paper
a iew weeks back, but i’ll go over some
at the important facts again, mostly
because its a curious thing to see
countryside become a huge lake from
one Summer to the next. i have an aunt
and uncle who live in knoxville, about
thirty miles south or newton, and we
drove through the area While the state
built the bridge and roads to skirt the
anticipated water. that part of the state
is all hills and Oak trees With high
slopes and deep gorges that cut across
the iarm land. red rock is just beyond
monroe to the south and the drive up
interstate so to newton, where you turn
south towards monroe — knoxville - etC.,
is iast enough to make in an hour or
two.
the bridge is notable because it's
super long and now takes you across
the middle of the lake. last Sunday We
came in trom pella and ended up across
the water and east of the bridge. we
weren't sure Whether We would find the
whole place ior a while, but just out-

The Scarlet & Black

snidern Newspaper oi
Grinnell College,

Grinnell. lowa

An independent nekws-
lsmuv piper unbiis on we: ly,
\‘ l W during holidays

‘3 23 itin‘i'xnmnunon pcriodr,
d by Him Grlnlicll Conic
SQ mlllec on Student Publi-
curious subscription

56.00 per
usAN KArscR
onucr: srnoivi
HILL nnrrnurx
oovib SWEE
snuan nuonrw
. won srookrcv
onvio iiuubioni
Lynn Allan».
Michael nrandnn, Kullly nun,
innn Gardner, no onto,
my Hazelkorn, i... Hincli, Ken rural,
Ken Lnbowllz, Molly MCGulIQi
.Ilmul snnin, .vonunr... Stein, Mary Zlek

immerse me

ya.

school

Editor .
business Manager
Managing Editor .
Assumi’llc Lilllor
copy Li or
sports tor,
Cnlcl photographer
Reporters

side of town we found ourselves en-
gulied by Sunday drivers presumed to
be on their own ways to picnic. , . ,
we had Visions of crowded ﬁelds and
picnic tables or families every ten
Ieet. the tralfic became very heavy
atter a conspicuous fork in the road
and began to resemble rush hour on
the freeway, with cars going but no-
where and all lined up bumper to
bumper.

strange . . . strange . . . strange we
all said, and being perverse to begin
with took the other fork and turned up
B marked dead end. we wanted to ﬁnd
some woods, near the water if we
could, but we certainly were not going
to sit in a car for two hours to get
there. dead ends that you can't see the
end of come in handy at times like that.

we followed the road to its end, which
perched with a iarm and cemetery
high above the lake. there were a iew
people decorating graves and no pic-
nickers in sight so we stopped and Im-
loaded. below us we saw recently
washed over shores with rows of trees
that hadn’t been submerged protecting
them. the scene was rustic and perfect
with high grasses and driitwood; gulliea
and pebbles and stones being our
things.

down . down . . . down and over
little hills til we come to a spot com-
plete with logs and kindling for a tire.
building big tires gives a good ieeling
of accomplishment and making log
benches and tables, even for the
meagerest feast, is delightful. we had
a good lunch after our labours, laid
around in the Sun and iinished the day
with an exploration to i'nd “the" ideal
campsite ior iuture visits.

the next time will be a whole week
end in the Wllds — a wonderiul way to
spend spring in inwa,

Ingllam all Brecht

Last Thursday night, Bob lngham and
assembled troupe provided my Modern
European history class with a dramatic
presentation oi Bertolt Brecht and his
role in the theater 0i Weimar Germany.
it was an enjoyable and intellectually
stimulating experience, the sort or hap-
pening which should not be so infrequent
at a college of Grinnell‘s curricular pie
tensions.

Assisted by Mrs. ingham, Miss Penny
Reed of the Milwaukee Rep, and ”Our
Own" Maunena Carter and Ken Hicks,
ingliam read from Brecht’s poetry on
the theater — verses charging electri-
cians, stage hands and actors to know
what they’re about and why — and then
presented a number ot briei excerpts
lrom Brecht's work, including a prelude
to the Juliet balcony scene which ended
with the bellyrbuckling laughrer oi the
audience.

Whether joined together with loving
care or bound tightly by the enthusiasm
oi the participants, the program had a
charming unity and a meaningiul thrust
which obviated the need {or proscenium
arch and gel-tramed lights. it was as
Brecht would have Wanted it, but not
beyond the criticism or local tyros like
Betts who iouud the introductory poetry
too long and read in a tone too matter-
oHact and not matterrolrtheater enough.

But why quibble with peripheral mat-
ters when the center oi the Arena Stage
was so wellroccupied with dramatic ac-
tivity that justitied brecht's beliei in the
purpose and value of theater oi instruc-
tlon.

Raymond Belts
Department oi History

ED. NOTE: This “intro-curricular"
study on Brecht is just the type or in-
terdisiplinary co—operalion which could
go tar in revitalizing the academic ai-
mosphere or this school. '

J ,. ..

 

Friday, April ii. I969

lETTEhS

Priorities Need Revision

An Open Letter to President Leggert
Dear Mr. Leggett,

This letter is in response to your re«
quest for ideas on your position paper on
Black Education at Grinnell. 1 don't pre~
tend to have more to say than the black
students on this campus about what
their education should be, but I do have
some ideas about Grinnell education in
general which I think are relevant,

It seems that this issue, as so many
others, is being considered ln a vacuum.
One by one, as new problems arise, they
are dealt with, or not dealt with, as the
case may be, and then disappear from
view, What is missing is a comprehensive
outlook on the meaning of education at
Gl'innell, with emphasis on the establish-
ment of a hierarchy of priorities. There
are many areas in which Grinneii is
sadly lacking, and other areas of over-
supply. Rather than deal with problems
piecemeal and solve them if money, and
especially time, is available at the
moment, now is the time for a long-range
look at possible pmblems of the future,
and then make room for the solutions.
Right now on campus we have a desire
for a re-evaluation of senior compre-
hensives and the grading system, and a
desire for furthering the social experi-
ment of coed living facilities, as well as
a desire for more and better black edu-
cation. What we also have on campus
right now is a $35,000 switchboard with
bathrooms, and an overpriced book-
store which most students boycott when<
ever they can, while the only construc-
tivo work that is visible on campus is
the $2 million eyesore behind Darby
gym.

I think it is important to look back on
What our priorities have been in the
past, and change them. It seems to be
a weliperpetuaied myth that the more
buildings Grinnell is comprised of, the
longer it. will endure, It should be oh‘
vious to anyone iomiliar with the de-
mands of rioting students at large unl-
versities that what is essentially going
to mean the difference between the de-
mise and longevity oi any educational in-
stitution in this country will rest on the
quality of the education found within,
and not the strength of the bricks or
the expertise or the architects. Grinnell,
as a small liberal arts college, is far
from the inhuman machinery of the
large urban or state university, Our task
here is not to sit back and gloat over our
superiority, but to make sure we maine
iain, and further, the high standards of
our educational commitment.

Sincerely,
Ann J. Kirschner '69

For School or
Typewriter
Supplies

Grinneli
Office Supply

Aston from m In! Omu
GRINNELL. IOWA

SCARLET AN D BLACK

“irresponsible Tactics"
Blasted

To the Editor:

There has been much discussion in the
last few weeks concerning the position
of the AFROTC unit on campus. There
has been in addition discussion of the
more limited topic of academic credit
for participation in the AFROTC pro-
gram. The 5&3 "news" story which
headlined the last issue of the newspaper,
which was devoted largely to the ROTC
question, did little to advance the cause
of rational discussion and less for the
cause of objective journalism. My views
were cited a number at times by the
author of the article, but did more to
misrepresent my views than it did to pre-
sent them, The quotations attributed to
me are simply inaccurate. In addition,
I specifically did not indicate any prea
ferellces concerning the AFROTC'S re
action in the event that the faculty ap-
proved the motion to deny academia
credit,

The specitic motion was raised primar-
ily in an attempt to encourage debate
and resolution, if possible, of the col-
lege’s relationship to outside institu-
tions as well as to open lot debate the
nature of the College curriculum and tho
role of academic credit. It was for this
reason that the question of academic
credit was put forth, in Mr. Grey's
terms, on narrow grounds. Clearly the
motion was supported or opposed for
widely divergent reasons. It is unrealis<
tic to assume that policy questions are
so simple that they will be perceived
the same way by all people or that these
questions can be discussed and resolved
without consideration to the broader
philosophical Questions.

On a related topic, I should like to
express my admiration for those who
telt strongly about this issue and took a
public stand — this applies equally to
those who signed and circulated the pe-
titions as well as to those cadets and
other opponents of the motion who puh-
licly articulated their positions. At the
same time I cannot refrain from express-
ing my anger at, contempt tor and dis-
appointment with those who felt it nec-
essary to eavesdrop on the iaculty meet-
ing, to seek publicity through symbolism
oi desecrating and displaying an Ameri-
can flag at the iaculty meeting, or to
send anonymous threatening letters.
These actions are at best counterproduo
tive to the goals supposedly held clear
by their perpetrators, These attempts
to hide behind anonymity, an unwilling
ness to take a stand publicly, bespeak a
moral cowardice. Al. a time when
charges of complicity are being thrown
about, the silence of those who were
aware of these actions and did nothing
to interfere with them might ask theme
selves it they too have engaged in com-
plicity.

The issues which the Grinnell commune
lty is now confronting are perhaps tri-
vial in the greater scheme of things;
nevertheless, the manner in which they
are solved is indicative of the way the
college will solve other problems which
are now and Will continue to confront it.
It is my conviction that these problems
can be met and solved through rational
and public interchange of ideas, and can
be affected only adversely by the re
treat into anonymity and irresponsible
actions.

Gregory Guroif
Department of History

No 60?
Call Bo

Texaco
236-7205

“Give me ROTC or
give me death!"

(The son was given the following letter
by Mr. Guroii, who found it ill his mail-
box. It is the less obscene or two letters
referred to in Gurott's Letter to the Edi<
lot, The 3&3 feels the letter must be a
gas.)

I am but a man. Born and raised and
where someday I shall die in the United
States at America. I am a proud man.
Proud of my country and at the beliels
for which it Stands. When I came to
Grinnell I was proud. It was a school
where a man's individual liberty was ad-
mired. It was a place where I could see
respect lor liberty, All that has changed
and I, I have set back and watched it
happen. Unbelieving, I have watched my
liberty, my rights, my life be destroyed.
I said they have a right to pursue their
rights, to express their views, to exercise
their liberty and what has happened?
Gone is my liberty! I am no longer ﬁres
to choose my path to happiness.

YOU came to me and said, “I have a
right to demonstrate in an effort to seek
change," and I said, "you have that
right."

You came to me and said, “I have
a right to seek to end the draft," and I
said, “you have that right."

You came to me and said, “I! I don‘t
choose to serve in the armed forces I
have the right not to serve" and 1 said,
“you have the right.”

I came to you and said, “I have the
right to serve in the armed forces of my
country” and you said, “I have not the
right."

I HAVE NOT THE RIGHT TO SERVE,

1 cannot belong to AFROTC because it
does not uphold the lofty traditions and
aims of this college, and closer to the
truth because it allows me to serve my
country's anned forces in my best ca-
paelty.

I HAVE NOT THE RIGHT TO SERVEI

How dare you take away my rights, I,
who was ready to die for my country,
for the beliefs for which it stands: to
protect your rights, your liberty, and
yet you seek to take from me my most
precious possession, my LIBERTY.

And What am I to do? I have talked
with you. I have pleaded with you. i
have begged you,

I Shall Talk No More.

I Shall Plead No More.

1 Shall Beg No More.

MY LIBERTY is MINE and the Lord's
mercy be on the souls of they who at-
tempt to deprive me or my LIBERTY.

S E L
'and Secure the Blessing
of Liberty‘

Defends ROTC Alternative

To the Editor:

As the committee appointed by Mr.
Wall studies the question of withdraw
ing academic credit from the AFROTC
program, ! suggest that its members
consider whether the issue would be al-
tered if the year were 1944 instead of
1969. For the sake of Grinnell’s charac<
ter as a liberal arts college, the answer
should not be “yes."

Insisting that the academic content of
courses in all departments meet cer-
tain minimum standards of quality is a
sound principle by which to modiiy the
academic curriculum. But educational
concern should not be a pretext tor the
expression of the current opinions of
some members of the college on immedi-
ate political issues. When the liberal alts
college bases its academic policies up-
on the political atmosphere of the mo-
ment, it denies the essence of its own
being, for it is then no longer I “liberal"
but a partisan institution.

lino Davin

Page Three

of Figs & Hawk

Hey, Grinnell College studentl Are
you tired or taking s-—t from the

town? When you are downtown do you
enjoy jumping out or the way of cars
that seem to be aimed at you? Now
think about why these things happen.
You are arrogant outsiders from big
cities; you descend upon Grinnell for
short lengths or time; while you are
here you look down upon Iowa and its
inhabitants, you criticize and laugh at
Grinnell's relative (nearly absolute)
cultural deprivation, and generally
View with scam the local inhabitants
who call this community their home.

This situation has existed for so long
that the college has institutionalized this
fear and misunderstanding; and the
college community has complacehtly
gone along ”because it's always been
that way." Have you ever been to A
college dance? I have a feeling that
I'm not the only one on this campus
who is uptight about the number of
FIGS on campus every Saturday night.
Why are they there? If you are so up.
tight about your personal safety at coi-
Iega dances that you prefer PIGS to
townies, then you are more paranoid
than this article. I mean, its our turf,
private property, right? PIGS are only
allowed with I search warrant, right?
Bull .

Those PIGS are there because a
bunch of old ladies run the Forum, give
sanction to scheduling of events, and
set down Forum policies in general.
Students just don't make rules like “no
barefoot in the Forum." Why Should
student Forum Workers wear a tie, or
be supervised by some old hag placed
there by the administration? My an-
swers to these questions may seem ob-
vious, but since Grinnell Students don't
grasp the meaning of action as well as
words, I will explicate.

Nothing would do more good for
town-college relations than an open in-
Vilation to teenagers in this town for
them to use college facilities. By tak-
ing responsibility as hosts the student
body would be challenged to confront
town stereotypes in the face, It would
be like meeting a nigger tor the first
time, right? Since we are all liberal!
here, I know that everyone agrees with
me, so far. Such a step would simul-
taneously remove any excuse for PIGS
being on college land. Finally, and
most important, these two steps will
he the first in the inevitable complete
turnover of the Forum's administration
to students, The administration has
their building, the taculty has many,
even B.&G. has two. The Forum is ours
by right of occupancy —— we want it.

Don Malum

“Sioopid
Siickons"

“The Medallion With
A Message"

From
AMERICAN
GREETING CARDS

Hie‘Brow Knack-Knacks

Hang One On For Only

69¢

FILL YOUR PHISOHEX
BOTTLE HERE

Tharp Pharamcy

725 Broad

 

Page Four

Plan Created for Student- lnit.‘

The following is a proposal
Tor Student Initiated Courses
(SIC) made by the Education
Project to the students, faculty
ind administration for their
consideration. The project mem-
bers have been writing and dis-
cussing several proposals for
curriculum change, but consid-
ers the one [or student-created
courses the most important ior
bringing not only a substantial
change in the lrinds of courses
offered, but also for changes in
methods and student—teacher re-
iationships. Please read the pro-
posals and feel iree to criticize
and make additions to them,
The next meeting of the Educa-
tion Project will be Tuesday,
8:00 p.m., Younker Lounge,

I. Definition: A Studentrlnl-
tinted Course (SIC) is a course
which originates with students,
the planning and direction of
which is a student enterprise
done in consultation with the
faculty. The role of the iaculty
may be as participant, consult<
ant or teacher as defined by

MOYER’S

EAST END
GROCERY

GROGERIES
MEAT - BEER

OPEN DAILY
8 AM. - 8 PM.

2 Iloeis East of Oil“

ISM 6th Ave. 6-4455

the students. While, as in any
accredited course, the ultimate
evaluation is a iaculty respon-
sibility, the process of evalua-
tion should be largely a student
concern. In particular, the stu-
dents should evaluate the course
as an educational venture, com-
paring it and contrasting it to
more traditional educational ex-
periences. SIC courses will be
identified as divisional, rather
than departmental, courses, i.e.
Social Studies SIC —— (number
to be determined by the initia-
tors in consultation with the di»
visional are appropriate to the
“level" of the course).

ll. Procedure. Students who
wish to initiate a course must
submit a tentative course sylla-
bus to the Educational Policies
Committee in the division with
which the course will be identi<
fled prior to the first meeting or
that committee following the
mid-term break. If a divisional
EFC reiuses to recommend ap-
proval oi the course, the student
may take his proposal to an-
other division or directly to the
Executive Council of the fac-
ulty. Student initiators (and
their faculty sponsor if it is de-
sired) should attend the meet-
ing of the EFC when their pro-
posal is being considered. The
syllabus shall be signed by the
student initiators and their tac-
ulty sponsor.

iii, Syllabus: The tentative
syllabus for the course will in-
clude the name of the course,
the division in which it will be
otiered, its proposed course
number, the number oi credits
expected, the semester for
which it is proposed. It will deal
with the following topics:

1) The content of the course
Ind the evolution of the idea
of the course (How has the
.,orlgtnal idea been modified?
What was the process of
consultation between students
and faculty involved?)

2) The structure and educa-
tional method of the course.
(Lectures? By whom? Semi-

 

Your new
boyfriend has a
new girlfriend?

Think it over, over coffee.

TheThink Drink.

vuywimmmbwnm. "ms: .smui..m..s.omsw-

1w...u.nmv..p.n.~.».o renown”...

looce "unannouncbuuoi ulxailun.

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. April ll. ms

 

nars? Led by whom? How
frequently to meet? Etc)

3) The resources to be util-
ized. (Bibliography, tapes,.
films, iield trip, visitors. how
to ﬁnance.)

4) The evaluation p r n c e-
dures to be used. (HOW and
by whom? What evidence of
accomplishment win be pre-
sented to evaluator(s)?)

IV. Enrollment: Alter the
course is approved by the di-
visional EPC and the Executive
Council of the faculty, the
course description will be suh<
mitted to the registrar for in-
clusion in the published list of
courses. Any student may reg-
ister tor the course, subject to
a registration limit imposed by
the initiators of the course. If
the course is oiiered in the fall
semester, incoming freshmen
are eligible to enroll if its mem-
bership quota has not been
ﬁlled by prerregistering upper-
classmen.

V. Grading: Student initiators
of a course may decide whether
it is to be graded, pass-fail, or
credit—erase, or whether this
may vary with individuals in
the course. The credit—erase op~
tion, to be created especially

‘for SIC Courses, implies that if

the student does not meet the
minimal standards oi [h e
course, it will simply be erased
from his transcript.

VI. List 0! Examples: ”Ven-
tures" in Content and Method.
The iollowing' course descrip-
tions were selected from a list
of SlC courses at the University
oi Calilomia, Berkeley, and
from Free University Berkeley,

RACE AWARENESS
AND SENSITIVITY

2-5 units, Sociology 191, grade
of Pass/No Pass. Barbara
Auther, a young black activist
writer and poefess, will give a
series of lectures on speciﬁc
areas of problems of race, such
as: “How Americans Become
Dehumanized," “Equal Ignor-
ance,” “Fear of the Unknown."
Poetry will be used to stimulate
discussions in class. There will
be field trips into the ghettos.
No limit to class size, Tuesdays,
7:30.930 pm.
AUTOMOBILE MECHANICS

Ever been burned by your

“local authorized dealer"? . . .
Ever been struck on the high-
way? . . . Want to know how
the "points" work? What about
buying a used car? This course
will attempt to give a broad
background in the functions of
your auto so you Can rind what
is wrong. We will also discuss
aspects of repair including cost,
so you can protect yourseli ironr
high/fraudulent repair charges.
Preventive maintenance and
other repairs as desired will ue
a part of the course (tools are
available). The relationship of
the auto industry to the (unc-
tionings of the capitalistic sys-
tem and how to cope with this
problem individually may be
topics for interesting discus-
sioll. Time to be arranged.
SARTRE

AND THE DEVELOPMENT
OF EXISTENTIAL FREEDOM

2-5 units, Political Science 199,
P/NP. The first weeks of the
quarter will be spent on the
intellectual background of Sar-
tre’s thought. Selections from
Nietzsche, Dostoevsky, Kierke-
gaard, Malraux, and auber will
be studied. For about 2 weeks
students will read and discuss
the earlier novels and plays of
Sartre. The remainder of the
quarter will be spent on ex-
cerpts from BEING AND
NOTHINGNESS and Existential
Psychoanalysis, Throughout the
entire quarter, the emphasis
will be on mutual participation
between students and discus
sion leaders, with the prob—
lems of freedom, authenticity,
interpersonal relationships and
human emotions pmvlding the
thematic focus.

There will he a variety or
guest lectures irom other in-
stitutions.

Vii. Motivation for student in-
iated courses.

Grinnell students have al«
ready b e g u n to initiate
courses, but they have been
proceduruuydlsgulsed as
group independents. Obviously
an administrative procedure
is needed to lactiitate the ac-
creditation of these courses
and to insure that all students
not merely the aggressive
few have access to them. The
process we have outlined does
not call inlo being any new

ted Courses

bureaucratic structure;
does insure that courses will
be thought out and submitted
to a certain amount of scru-
tiny before they begin.

It is believed that the credit«
erase option diminishes to some
degree the "taskmaster" role of
the iaculty member. While
evaluation will occur, it is (le-
sirable that this take place m
an atmosphere of cooperation
and joint concern, rather than
one in which students compete
for rewards or punishments.
The crediterase option may in~
deed complicate the task OI des
termining when a student’s
academic standing is inadequate
to allow him to continue at the
institution. It is hoped that this
difficulty can be overcome by
requiring that x number of
credits be completed at the end
of each semester with Y minih
mal grade point. Unlike a re-
corded failure, the “erase" op-
tion does not become an alba.
tross about the student's neck,
and does not scar his record. it
simply signifies what has in
fact taken place; he has tailed
to accomplish this particular
educational goal, and so does
not receive credit for it.

This semester group inde-
pendents — the Education
Project, Contemporary Europe.
an N o v e1, Communication:
Seminar, and the Seminar in
Ethical Discussion -— are ex-
amples of courses which would
fall under the SIC heading.

This list of examples is, at
best, incomplete; the variety
of SIC courses is limited only
by student imagination and
EPC willingness to accredit
them. Catalogs oi SlC courses
from other institutions are
available in the Conference
House lounge lor reading at
any time.

=

Photo Contest

THEME: The Image of the

Twentieth Century City
ENTER: Color, new. or
8mm. Film

DEADLINE: April 15

CONTACT: Mssrs. lanes or
Pollack for funher d ‘ails.

 

lam opposed to the Vietnam War laud any ml. war that is noi based upon
deiense of our countryl Please send me application is the Ministry at your church
as well as information is to its belleis and membership lhrouglioui the world

ll .3 my understanding that if I am accepted to his ministry of your church. l
can ncl conscientiously participate in any military involvement ncf direCily con-
cerned with the defense of our country or its possessions. Ifurlher understand that
training will not interiors with my normal Work or academic schedule, _ and l
can cllcose my own location or service to God and humanity.

Enclosed is $1.00 to cover clerical expenses and cost of mailing.

NAME
ADDRESS
CITY .

AGE .

Mail entire ad to: Church of the Humanitarian God:
P.0. Box 13236: St. Petersburg. Florida 33733

I‘

 

Friday, April ll. mo

SCARLET AND BLACK

Page Fiv-

 

Crandall Won't 60

Grant Crandall has been named A
recipient or the Rhodes Scholarship
which provides ior study at the Univcra
sity of Oxford for men from specified
areas overseas. Crandall is one or thirty-
two American men who were awarded
this scholarship tor excellence in scholas—
tic attainment, spirit, qualities of man-
hood, truth, and courage, success in mark
iy outdoor sports, and instincts to lead.

Due to his dmrt status, Crandall will
not be able to immediately accept the
scholarship and could forfeit it altogeihv
er. It Crandall were to accept the sclioa
larship, he would "almost certainly" be
drained within the year. objecting to
the war in Vietnam, he has elected to
join the Peace Corps and will be going to
Lesotha to do agricultural extension work
later this summer. i-ioperully, his drait
board will grant him a 2A status.

Delays on accepting the scholarship
are given only {or military service. Be-
cause at least one hall oi the Ameri-
can recipients are having severe diart
problems, military related situations
such as the Peace Corps and Vista may
also quality ror delay. it when he coma
pletcs his Peace Corp service the war
in Vietnam is not over, Crundali's con-
aidering leaving the country or going to
jail. In either case he would iorleil his
scholarship.

According to Pentagon statistics six
times as many college students are being
draited this year as compared to last.
Crandall emphasized that his case was
not unique and that most seniors are
having equal difﬁculty in adjusting their
lives around the drart.
++t§~++t§dVrI tM'IP-P?

The Annual Social (10 « urdinator’s
Variety Show will be presented in the
South Lounge on Tuesday, April 15, at
9:00. The entire committee will be avail-
able tor questions and discussion.

Affairs Committee Acls on Housing

By TONI TRIPLE”

in a series of tour meetings, the Stu-
dcnt Atiairs Committee recently made
a number of signiﬁcant policy recom-
mendations. The rirst, dealing with next
year‘s allocation oi the (our college
owned on campus houses, came aiter in-
tel'VlewS With five student groups who
had submitted proposals Ior committee
evaluation.

Taking into account such factors as
innovations, degree or expressed stu-
dent interest, and expected academic
value, the committee recommended that
a co—ed German language group, an Ain-
erican Ioiklore pl‘DyeCK, and a co—ed edu«
cational experiment — the inner Col-
lega — be granted use or the houses. Be-
cause or the anticipated Size oi the Inner
College group, that project was given the
use oi two houses.

These recommendations are not final,
however, and are ultimately subject to
space considerations now being com-
puted by the Dean's Dilice.

Applications ror those students wishing
to live in private on campus housing
next year were due March 15. Mrs. Low
reported that sixty»tive applications were
received by her orricc at that date.

The committee received the report 0!
on ad hoc Residence Hall Planning Com-
mittee (chairman, Doug Ensminger)
and approved the recommendation for
increasing the availability of the co-ed
option. Assuming the existence or funds
ror partial renovation, Loose hall next
year will be a wad dorm with men and
women living on separate ﬂoors or in
adjoining wings.

The student members at the commit-
tee, Tom Thomas, Heather Foote, and
Lee Mani, noted the widespread student
discontent over the content of the cob
lege's contract with SAGA Food Services
Specifically. many oil-campus students

LOST?

Yesterday} Politics

Will Be Relegatetl
To Rigllt Field!

IDENTIFY WITH THE NEW POLITICS

Interact With lerry Rubin, (Yippiesl,
Allard Lowenslein (N. Y. Democrall
Rev. Andrew Young IS.C.LC.I, Elc.

Join the cast of 1,089 Young, Liberally
Educated Youths. Get out of yourapaiheiic,

apolitical hole and attend.

THE NEW

POLITICS

CONFERENCE
April I6-l8

are dissailslied with the board fee re-
qlllreiiient, and a large number at on.
campus residents resent having to pay
lor three meals every day. Alternatives
to the present acrossrtheboard lee ar<
rungement, such as a system where
students may register and pay tor only
the noon and evening meals, are now
betlig studied. The committee has been
inrormcd. however, that any change train
the present contract will prompt an ins
crease in the cosi—per—medi for all stu-
dents

Cops on
Campus

By TED CLICK

Saturday night there was quite li stir
among students caused by the presence
ol what seemed like the entire Gx‘lnnell
police rorcc on the Grituicll College cam<
pus. Rest assured, students. The Police
State has not yet Come to Grilinell; this
over-presence or the police was more a
misunderstanding and, as Miss Georgia
Dental put it, a “comedy of errors" than
a conscious attempt py Chier Peters and
his men to intimidate the Grllinell Stu-
dent body.

At some point early Saturday night
there was some minor trouble among
visitors irorn Des Moines. As a precalb
tionary measure, and because there were
to police at the dance in Gardner
Lounge, Ernest Weston inquired about
having a policeman present.

it seems that there was a large amount
oi activity as a result of this request.
Mrs. hawk, director or the Forum, upon
hearing or Westan's request, called Doug
Ensmlnger, R, A. in Younker, and Elis-
minger went to Gardner to check on
the situation. Dale Hawn, director of the
Physical Plant, was also notiﬁed of Wes-
ton's desire tor a policeman. An elec-
trician, working at Gardner, also an
auxiliary policeman, went into uniiorm
alter Weston's request. Hawn then called
Fred Grandstalf. chiei of the auxiliary
police, and three additional auxiliary
policemen, above the two already at
the Forum and [he electrician at Gard—
her, were put into action.

The incident as conveyed to Grandstair
indicated to him that there was a condi-
tion or near»hysteria among the students.
Instead of the officer Weston had re-
quested, there were six policemen roving
around the campus, at times all or
them together and at times three at each
dance. All six were not regular police
but rather auxiliary police, townspeople
who volunteer their services tor the good
or the community

in discussing the policy or having town
oiiiuals at Campus activities, Grinnell
Police Chief Peters Said, "I have 3,200
people to take care or in this town. i
don’t want to go up there. l’d rather let
the college he."

} Decision

Continued from Page i

would pass," Sieger said, although h-
did nuL vote for the motion

Stegcr believes that the decision
“threatens the ROTC program at Grin-
hell, but not directly,"

“It doesn't break the contract, but it
will tend to make the program less via<
hie," Stegcr explained.

Steger added that he was “In complet-
Iccord" with the taculty motion estoh-
lishlng a committee to review the ROTC
program at Grinncll.

Wall said that faculty members en-
gaged in “very good debate" over tho
Guroir motion. "It was pretty rational
and well thought out," he said.

Sieger and USAF Capt. Philip 0. Fur-
dom participated “very little" in the de<
hate, according to Wall. “They answered
some questions,” Wall said.

Wall said he thought professors voted
(or the Gurolf motion for “a great
variety or reasons,"

“Some were just in opposition to tho
existence or the military on campu
Others were hopeful that the motion
would result in a rethinking or currlclh
Tum," Wall speculated,

Protessors voted against the motion tor
“a great variety of reasons also,” he
Said. “Some thought it didn’t go far
enough and some thought there hadn't
been an adequate study. Others thought
it was essentially a departmental matter
while others were opposed to the who].
idea because they lilte the status quo."

Asked about his personal leeliligs in re-
gard to the faculty’s actions on the Gus
roli motion, Wall replied, “I'm satisfied,
particularly coupled with the Kissane mo<
lion."

Wall said he has “mixed feelings"
about whether the military should bu
allowed on campus at all.

Gumii said he made the motion be.
cause “the ROTC program stands out-
side the regular program of the col-
lege."

“Now Is the time for the Air Force
to tell us why there should be a ROTC
program at Griiinell and why it warrants
credit, and then let us decide,” Gumﬂ
Commented.

“Given the pasi history of Grinnell,"
Guroli said he was surprised that his mo.
tion was approved. “The faculty is not as
resistant to change as some oi the
younger ioculry had believed"

_._/_. _ _,,_4_

NOW
I: the "me for ideas in SGA
BRUCE MORRISON has NIB
IDEAS

lalubllsl I I. a scholoriliipt
lit-prov. library facilitiu

Pass a irtidem hill or right;
Enlurg- the College aonli Sici-

voiE MONDAV FOR IDEAS

BRUCE MORRISON
for the Senate

 

Maybelline

Natural
Demi Lashes

$225

Clllililliollhhl
DRlIG

236-315] 327-4th

I’entaeags

mus was! GUM!"

Just Received!

New shipment or

PANTI HllSE

All Colors

52% n.

Only

 

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. April ll, 19”

i'lioliias, Futile and died! - Final ii eiview on and

By DAVID SWEE

in a recent interview with the 55:3,
the outgoing SGA executive cabinet
sharply criticized the administration a.
they talked about the frustrations that
they enoountered in their year in oﬂica.

Tom Thomas, outgoing SGA president,
complained that the Student Affairs
Committee (SAC), is used to legitimize,
in the guise of decisions made by it
student—facultyvadminlstratlon commit-
tee, programs already decided upon by
the dean's office. Lee Mari], outgoing
CoiHP president, claims that the stu-
dents don’t need the SGA. the adminis-

Slep Up To

JD'S RESTAURANY

922% Main
Mon. - 5st. 5 to lo p.m.
Sunday — Noon in in pro.

tration, or many segments at the facul-
ty. And Heather Foote, outgoing Aws
president. talked about how the adminis-
tration keeps the students under control
by staying an inch ahead or them. "Peo-
ple have been inching along the ruler,
but if they don't watch out. the ruler is
going to break."

They all agreed that their biggest dis-
illusionment came in finding that the
SAC has no real power. Although it is
thought to be the iinal decision making
body next to President Leggett, both
the students and the faculty have found
that the important decisions are made by
the Deans outside the committee, which
is then lctt to work out the petty details.
As Tom Thomas said, “The power of the
SAC is merely peripheral, since it con-
cerns itself only with minor details." He
pointed out that the iaculty members also
have reservations about the committee
being merely a “butter" to placate stu»
dents.

in concluding their discussion at the
SAC, the executive cabinet warned of
the dangers in the present committee.
As Tom said, “Problems are brought to
the sac simply because it exists. in-
stead oi this approach, students should
be demonstrating and bringing pressure
to bear on President Leggett, where it
may have some eiiect." Lee added.
“The committee is basically all Uncle
Tom committee.” And Heather conclud-
ed with a few more concrete examples.
"Loose is already designated as a co-ed
dorm, although the committee hasn't

 

if) For Young
" Elegance

Shop Poynler's
FOR YOUR

SPRING

FORMAL
Smorily Styled By
Lorrie Deb

and
Lanz

Considered it. And adiiiiiiisti‘ation has
also decided that one oi the women’s
halls will be turned into a men's hall. All
that is left to the committee is to decide
which particular ball will be changed,
and even that is dependent on size and
which RAs are to be hired, so that there
are only a lew alternatives.”

There then followed a discussion at
some oi the things the executive cabinet
felt they had accomplished. They all
agreed that Tom Triplett has been an ex-
cellent and helpful Student Coordinator,
Lee felt that the four at them had accel-
erated the “scheduled time-table con-
cemlng rules." He thought it was good
that they had “hassled people and made
them think.” Tom thought that their
biggest contribution was in changing
the concept of the SGA 1mm a monolithic
student voice to a more realistic coali»
tion of interested studentsi Lee added
that they had succeeded in not falling
into the traditional role of SGA, but
tailed in expecting too much irom the
CDIHP. AWS Boards.

Part of the problem is that the admin-
istration is used to student body presiv
dents with the style at a Ric McDowell,
who released administrative secrets only
when appropriate, and was a close friend
ot President Leggett. Heather pointed out
that this year's executive cabinet tried
to do away with the aura surrounding
student leadership, "to do away with
the facade that you are expected to put
on. ‘You must iteep your distance be
cause you have administrative secrets.’ "
Tom added that when the Deans coma
piained to him about remembering “that
when ! speak in public, i'm not Tom
Thomas, but an SGA president. What
they don’t remember is that I was elect-
ed SGA president because I am Tom
Thomas.” None of the SGA executive

No More Regular

There used to be time when one could
buy plain or “regular" Yoghurt at the
forum grill. But last week the forum
quit stocking regular yoghurt. When
asked why, the grill women replied,
“we said so much that We couldn't keep
it in stock." It is still possible to obtain
the ﬂavored variety.

cabinet feels that they should "rule"
student government or play in a mirror.
kingdom oi the adult world.

As mentioned before. Tom sees an im—
poriant change in the SGA role, “lactate,
the SGA was consensus of student
Opinion, especially as reﬂected in the stilr
dent senate. But that myth has been
abandoned. We now deal with diversi—
fied needs and limited interests." Heatir
er added that a reflection of this is the
trading oi house presidents as the student
leaders. As she sees 1t, her job has
evolved to a student “who has more
contacts. and is thus able to ask better
questions." Lee sees his role as “reflect-
ing ways people are thinking, or at
least some people." Tom talked about
a student leader's job as deceiving in
that “As long as students think they
are talking to the power structure,
they are not going to get anywhere, es
pecially when the power structure hands
down decisions disguised as compro—
mises.”

in talking about the future. Tom said
that “we’re only haltrway there, for we
haven't even realized the potential of
students acting cohesively.” Heather re-
sponded explaining that the SGA will not
even be needed in the future, and she
envisioned some student pressure groups
in the iorm oi student unions. “My job
should melt away in a few years.” Les
said that, “What we have here is {I
growing population of middleclass. ali—
enated people, 18 through 22, and I
don’t think they’re going to take the
we’ve been getting, much longer.
Maybe it Slocum had stayed, and kids
had been forced to rebel, we would have
been much farther along already.
The administration has now evolved into
an institutionalized paciiier, always one
step ahead oi student demands.”

The SGA executive cabinet warned that
the new SGA will never be effective I( it
doesn’t learn to handle the money issue
which they reel is at the root of mmly
campus ills. As Tom said, “Right now,
we have a seii-deieating system, what we
might call the prime-thepump theory or
college finance. we spend our money in
ways that attract more money. And we
spend that money so that we will at-
tract even more money. it never stops.
And thus we get a gym and a reception
center. The student seems to be a third
party who is scarcely considered.”

 

TIME TO HIKE

out to Grinnell’s biggest little gill shop
TOWN and COUNTRY

East end of 4th Ave., lust post the East Hospital
Open Monday through Saturday mo to 5:30

Just in —

Peace symbol seal for use with sealing wax
Unusual pierced and Pierced look earrings

New poison rings

Poynters 4th Ave. Fashions, lnc.

GRlNNELL'S COMFLETE STYLE SHOP FOR WOMEN
SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY

Store Hours:
Noon 'iii 9 Mondays; s Ti] 5 Tuesday thru Saturday

Glamorous l‘ing-wristlets

All sorts of stickons, even a zipper for your V W

Gourmet gadgets — great for showers and
weddings

Remember. Mother's Day ls lust a month away. Town and Country

has inst the gift for her and will wrap it tree. all set for mailing.

g.

‘.

i

 

Friday. April II, 1959

SCARLET AND BLACK

Page Seven

 

G Marlyrs' Weekend Helps Define Black-While Conilicl

Where the
Truth Hurts

_ By Tom THOMAS

The most obvious similarity between
the‘recent Black Martyr's program and
last years’ discussions [allowing the
assassination of Dr. King was the re-
current question: “What is the role of
the white individual who is concerned,
impathic, active, etc?” It is perhaps
significant of the transition of the “civil
rlghm movement” to a Black liberation
struggle met this year the questions
seemed to be but Cliches and the answers
seemed far more difficult to find.

To understand the complexity of this
problem for the white Grinnell Student,
it is iirst necessary to examine the posi-
tlon (of confusion) in which he finds
himself, in a simplistic sense, the Grin-
nell student is generally sympathetic
toward and concerned about the “Black
movement." Recalling the righteous ex<
hilaratlun of civil rights marches and We
Shall Overcome and succumbing to latent
activist tendencies, he looks for a ”role
of participation." Having read hiack
Power and a little of Malcolm X, he is
ready to join the movement. The stu<
dent is then frustrated when he finds
that his idealism is re b u fie d. that
the “Block struggle" is exactly that,
and, to his surprise, somebody actuab
ly doesn’t want him because, of all
things, he is white.

Reading Malcolm X a little more close-
ly, he learns 01 a sarcalled “supportive
role,” but this is very unclear. Question—
ing Black students or black leaders re-
sults in the same answer, “You've got
your problems, and it's your problem
to solve them." His posttion of support
becomes one at not~so~sure affirmation
of Black demands. His desire to be
“where the action is” is frustrated, his
own position becomes further confused,
and most of all, he feels the hopeless-
ness of doing nothing.

The white student feels condemned to
inactivity by his color, rejected by Blacks
as a member of the white racist society
of oppressron. However, it is in the very
fact that the student is white, that he is
a. member of the racist society, that the
role of his participation is deiined should
he choose to accept it. One must first res
member that It is the racist Society in
America which is both responsible for
the conflict and the target of the Black
liberation movement. Being already a
member ol this society holds advantages
to the concerned student that are avail-
able to no Black man.

It is in the White, middle-class com-
munities of this country that the battle
must be fought 7 a fight that has not
even yet really begun. This may lack the
dynamism of the strrogle in the urban
ghetto and the high vi bllity of a march
or demonstration, but its importance is
as extreme. Beginning in his own com-
munity and starting in his own context,
the white student of today must address
the task of provoking change in the
thought patterns of his society, a process
that will go back to the very ioundation
of this country, of which today’s racism
is but a latent manifestation.

The process, above all, must be an
educative one. The greatest failure of
our society, dramatically portrayed
throughout the “racial issue,” is a pro.
round inability to understand melt, or
even to engage in analytical introspec<
tion. To combat this, one must force in<
dividuals to go beyond the sophmoric
approach to America characterized in
high school U.S, history courses and
examine the oppressive past of our comb
try’s racism. There must be an under.

TRUTH-
(Continued on Page 12, Column 2)

 

Photo By LARRY FRANK

Dr. Rev. Martin Luther King is a martyr and hero for all humonitarlans. How-
ever, his tactics are now more relevant in the anti-war movement than the
Black Power struggle.

 

rune Part E Clarifies Stand

An article reporting the major ideas presented by four mem-
bers of the Black Panther Party at a panel discussion last Satur-
day was supposed to appear in this space. The Printer or the
Scarlet and Black however, found some of the direct quotes in
the article to be potentially obscene and refused to print the
Panther statements. The article‘s author prelers not to run the
article it the complete text cannot be run for it is vital to
an understanding of Ihe Panther position, the goal or the article.

The editor ﬁnds this action as a form of censorship of the
Black movement and a failure to be aware of the accepted lan«
guage. Out-moded white values are being applied to accepted, nor
mal behavior. Times are changing and the press Should he allowed
to communicate that change, (See Editorial)

“Sleeping Through
A Beyolution”

By HOWARD WARD

Why honor‘ Black martyrs’ on a col-
lege campus which is located in an all
white Iowa town, which has a Black
student population of less than 5%,
and can only boast of having three Black
professors on its staff? Why didn’t some
Concerned Black~ Studenm honor their
Black martyrs in Des Moines or in some
area where Black people predominately
preside? The reason for having Black
Martyrs' Day was not primarily for the
beneﬁt of the handful 01 Black inhabi-
tants 0f Grinnell College, but for the
education or the “white majority" on
this campus, those people who are too
undel- exposed to Black feelings, Black
culture, and Black people.

Black Martyrs’ Weekend gave the
“white majority” the opportunity to
view in their own surroundings, Black
reelings, Black culture, and Black people.
Black feelings were presented through
the film excerpts of the late Dr. Martin
Luther King, Jr., whose assassination was
commemorated by the Black Mal'tyrs'
Weekend. His warnings to white Ameri-
ca ot “sleeping through a revoluti 1"
rang vehemently through Herrick Chapel
and almost everyone was grasped by
his words. A contrast or Black feelings,
culture, and people was presented
through the choral selections of the
Chicago Ensemble Gospel Group, and
through the words of Father Bene-
ree. The gospel group exempliﬁed a
portion of Black culture through the
sounds of gospel-spirituals, which was
reminiscence of the anguish and toil im-
posed on the Black man in this country
for 300 years. Father Benefee, who may
have been viewed by some as a radical
priest was illustrative of one portion
of the Black mood present today in this
country. Some whites in the audience
may have been orrended by Father Eerie—
lee’s words, while others may have been
angered, yet nevertheless the Black‘
priest “did his thing” and told those in
the chapel what he stood for and how he
felt. This included the fact that Black
people are going to get themselves to«
gether, and are not concerned about
what the white man does.

The sensitivity sessions, which were
held during the afternoon, were designed
to bring out the true emotions of both
Blacks and whites in regards to race.
poverty, and other related problems of
today’s society. These sessions were
guided through me expertise of trained
social workers and counselors.

A crowded South Lounge witnessed rep
Iesentatives of the Black Panther Party.
who emphasized the principles and ideo-
logies of their organization. As shocking
as it may have been, those kids not only
represented the Black Panther Party,
they expressed the views of many young
people across this nation, which entails
the banding together of the oppressed,
Black and White, against the oppressor.

Professor Charles H. Nichols, visiting
professor of History and American stu-
dies, presented on academic overview of
the present mood in America, and em-
phasized the need for understanding and
thought in society today. Here was an
opportunity for both whites and blacks to
listen to the realistic views of an edu-
cated Black man.

Maybe for those whites who listened
and learned there is some hope, and for
those others i . I! And as Father Eerie
fee closed his speech, he held up a gun
clip and said, "We shall overcome," and
the Black Panther stated, “Stick em up
Mother this iS a holdup.
We've come lo 'get our share."

 

Page Eight SCARLET AND BLACK Frldey. Apr" III 1969
M

 

 

Marches Resumed

Peace Movement Erection llil

Photography By Lawrence FranE

Over Easter Weekend, peace demo
ltrallons resumed across the natio
Grinneli students were presenui
marches in Chicago and New York.

The March in Chicago drew betwee
10.000 and 30.000 demonstrators. It wa
a diverse group, encompassing the lot.
of the present peace movement: 1m
radical students to groups such as th
Businessmen for Peace, Veleransgfo
Peace, and Women for Peace. The lar
est portion at the demonstrators wer
students. The line of march extende
between 1% to 2 miles down State Stre
and was lined with a generally sym
pathetic crowd and very considerat
Chicago policemen.

As the marchers moved along thei
route carrying signs, chanted sloga
passed up and down the line. Occasion
ally, members or the crowd joined to
march. A rally held in the Colisseum
at the end of the route, featured a blac
0.1. speaking on the lack oi support to
the war existing among the ranks at th.
army.

The demonstration in New York wa
similar but on a larger scale, includ'n_
around 50,000 demonstrators. Again, [In
wide range or the peace movement t
day was shown by the presence at group.
as oitierent as G.I.'s, veterans, Blac
Panthers, and the Communist Party
The march was held peacefully hetor.
a largely sympathetic audience. in spit
or rain, a large crowd remained i
Sheep’s Meadow in Central Park 10 lis
ten [0 Abbie Hoffman, Jerry Rubin, sum
G.l.’s and several other speakers.

Two Grinrlell students who attende-
lhe marches expressed some Oplnll)"
concerning the iuture oi the us. peac-
movement. They were Ted Glick, “ht
was present in Chicago, and Larly Frat
who journeyed to New York.

 

 

r 1 E ”1969 XCARLET AND BLACK

 

 

 

Photo By KEN SEGA].

 

 

 

 

(91ch returned with the feeling that
'demonstrations in the style at last week-
and had passed the point of any signiﬁ-
cant eflectlveness on the nation; they
sen/e now only as inspiration and re«
infurcement for the participants. Glick
personally feels that the movement has
two ways to chomse from in the future.
One is active Civil disobedience and com«
munity organizing; the other is violence.
Both involve a great. deal more risk for
the participants,

Larry Frank views the present situa-
tion as a return to an earlier stage.
Frank ielt this to be the end of the
peace movement's sellimposed morator-
ium which began at the time of Mo-
Carthy’s candidacy. At this point, the
peace movement has in a way gone
back to its beginnings. He stated that
each of the previous changes in the
peace movement would be quickly run
through and more steps will be added
until the nation responds, Some of the
patience is gone. The move, he felt.
would be toward violence. Frank said
however, that he didn't think violence
would come lor a long lime, Since ille
administration was “mu smart." The
threat of violence, he thought, would
produce results.

The peace movement has matured,
become more pragmatic, more cynical,
and more able to organize itselt into nee
tion. There is promise of a great deal of
change in the means of expressing dis-
content with the existing lack of peace.

 

Page Ten

SCARLET AND BEACK

Friday, 'April II. 1959

 

Vacations Spent for Relevant Education

,By SARAH ANDREW
and LYNN ADAMS

Grinnell students participat-

. ing in the Voluntary Inner-City

Urban Seminar Programs dur-
ing spring break returned with
new outlooks on the problems
of the city’s inner core. The
relative success of the pro-
grams varied in each city but
all otlered an exposure to a
different way of life

The Grinnell group in Des
Moines was surprised to sea
the fundamental opposition to
plans which look so good in
theory. In the 30% Black Mod-
el Cities area the Black Pan»
thers serve tree breakfasts to
children; there is, at the same
time, an estimated 300—400 Vigi-
lantes opposing the Panthers
and representing a heavy and
growing backlash.

Two relatively successful or-
ganizations were visited by Stu<
dents in Des Moines. One was
a program sponsored by the
Y.M.C.A. which requires that

students go to school in the
morning in order to obtain jobs
(provided by local business-
men) in the afternoons, The
program has helped greatly in

‘reducing truancy among high

school students. Another is the
Detox Center, a model rehabili-
tation center for alcoholics. Al-
coholics a re treated here
through a ten day detoxication
period, group therapy and a
two-year followvup program.
The Detox Center has cut down
the population 01 Des Moines‘
skid row by about 1000.

In the area of housing there
is a major conflict between
013.0. and the Model Cities
Program in Des Moines. 0f the
two programs, Model Cities
seems more effective because
there is more local initiative in
its organization. Model Cities is
now in a year of planning all
over the U.S. Model Cities is
thought to be better than Urban
Renewal in that it rehabilitates
as much as possible, whereas
Urban Renewal tears down and

it c a t t e r s neighborhoods, Al-
though many people in the area
are not reached by any pr0<
gram, there is relatively much
more community participation
than in the past.

At the St. Louis Grace Hill
Settlement House, in an 80%
white neighborhood, there were
worries about What funds would
be available from the new Nix-
on administration. Funding was
the most immediate worry of
the organizations working in
this area.

Grinneli students in St. Louis
actually worked for the Settle-
ment House. They carried out
a survey of the number of
families in an area being con-
sidered for Urban Renewal, ilr
formed a neighborhood of a
party for Head Start children
and organized women to meet
in their homes to discuss prob-
lems with a social worker.

In Deliver, the students lived
in Hair-way House with re-
tellabilitated alcoholics who

were able to do only about two

 

SKIRTS - SWEATERS
:SLACKS

Enjoy your clothes as you did
when they were new. Our
professional drycleaning-

teamed with MAGIC FINISH

by Sta*Nu makes your

1“ Q clothes look and feel like new.
Come' m or call, we value

every customer as a friend.

Available At Both

North and South Campus

Cleaning Agencies

EKER’S Laundry and Dry Cleaners

101 9% [ROAD

hours of piecemeal labor after
getting over the shakes in the
morning and before beginning
to drink again at night. The
program aimed at helping alcos
hulics to move gradually DH
skid row. The center was iso-
lated within the city or Denver
and involved little community
work. Tilt students commented
that there seemed to be a limit
to the pressure which anyone
could bring to bear on the in-
ner-city problems.

The program in Denver was
sponsored by an inner-city
church which has no real con-
gregation and functions only to
provide food and clothing to the
surrounding c o m m u nit y or
Blacks and Mexicans. This
poverty area is composed of
government housing r a t h e r
than tenement slums but very
little community spirit existsr

Education is apparently pool",
for Grinllell students spent
some time tutoring people to
help them get their high school
equivalents. The students felt
that those in Denver respon<
sible for the inner-City Seminar
were not particularly interested
in the program.

Gl‘innell students in New
York stayed with families alld
individuals in East Harlem,
which is 40% Black, 40% Puer-
to Rican and 20% other. Edu-
cation was considered one of
the greatest problems in this
inner city where 30% of the
students entering high school
drop out, 11 a student ﬂunks
once, he can sit and do noth-
ing, scarcely attend school,
and he Will be passed along
with his class until he gradu-
ates with a general diploma,
Many Puerto Ricans, for ex-
ample, otten graduate at a

Grade Option Sought

By MARY MALCOLM

The grading system has al-
ways been a rather suspicious
member of the academic Cour
munity. It fosters competition,
blurs distinction and demon»
strates a rigidity unbecoming
to a friend in good standing of
the liberal arts.

The offices of motivation and
evaluation could well be carried
out in ways friendlier to the
love of learning. But the grad.
ing system has “connections"
ill the outside world. It is a
bit like a rich uncle — you
may not like his values, but
you keep him around in case
you ever need a job reference
or a loan. 50 Grinnell College
keeps the grading system,
though some of us may chate
at its implicit values, so as not
to disadvantage students who
may transfer, go to graduate
school. or seek employment.

it would be utterly idealistic
of me to suggest that Grinnell
eliminate grades entirely, and
we know how unpopular ideala
ism is these days. But perhaps
my more pragmatic colleagues
would consider a proposal to
reduce its hegemony some»
what. After all, we took the
ﬁrst timid step in that very
direction when we introduced
the pBSSAiall option. of course
pass-fail only free: a student

third grade reading level be-
cause they enter school unable
to speak English. Efforts to m-
crult bHingual teachers have
not been too successful. The
teachers in East Harlem are
otten either those who have
failed in other New York
schools or those who are new
and unexperienced. These
teachers do not know how to
reach the students of the ghet-
to for whom education is not
an ingrained value or an ex.
pectation as in a middle class
environment,

Parents in the neighborhood
are pressing for community
control of the schools with
hopes of being able to hire and
fire teachers and choose cur-
riculum. The potential in com-
munity control was shown
during the N.Y. teachers' strike
when only the experimental
schools, those already commua
nlty-controlled, stayed open
With unusually high attend-
ance.

Tile students were particularu
1y impressed with Phoenix
House, a rehabilitation center
for drug addicts which Claims
80% success. it is a center
with 70 members, run on a self-
help, co-op basis. All members
Work within the center, at e
craft, a shop, or a maintenance
job. Grinnell students were sur-
prised at the self—education and
self-pride of the exdrug ad-
diets.

In the area of housing, East
Harlem finds 0.13.0, and other
government funds have too
many strings attached, There
is a growing number of auton-
omous community housing or-
ganizations. Although presently
their programs affect only (our
blocks out oi perhaps 600 these
groups are looking for more
funds and expect to expand
their programs

from grades in a particular
course, and does nothing to
loosen the noose of the grade
point average hanging con-
stantly around his neck. But it
would not seem unthinkable,
and Certainly not out of Keep-
ing with the spirit of the liber-
al arts, to now take a second
bolder step: a voluntary grad-
ing system.

Procedurally, this would
mean that a student must reg-
ister especially for a grade it
he wishes to receive one. Other-
wise his transcript will simply
record credit [or a course suc«
cessfully completed, with no
record of a Course not com-
pleted or unsuccessfully com-
plated,

My own consciousness
and my teacher's mat my
learning was being graded be-
came a real obstacle to self-
motivation. I would have wel-
comed (and during the Sum<
mers did welcome) opportu<
miles to study free from grade
and develop my stunted lacul-
ties for motivation and evaluat-
ing my own learning. it Grin-
nell opened this option to stu-
dents iar whom grades are a
distraction, while maintaining
grades tor students who desire
them as credentials, it could
become a more interesting and
educational place.

 

Friday. April II. m9

SCARLET AN D BLACK

Page Eleven

 

'i'he $6: Reviews:

The Confessional Novel in M ode-m Literature

By GARY GlDDINS

It is an oft quoted cliche that the
age gets the quality of art that It de-
serves. For many reasons, the 1960‘s
is immersed in popular artr I suppose
that the locus on creating for the “now,"
out of resources esoteric to the immed-
iate present and with no ambitions for
artistic immortality or worries about
the academic propriety of the results,
presents the illusion of freedom and rel-
evance to the artist.

That part of the American culture
which the media have chosen to perpet-
uate has taken the form of Campbell
Soup cans, a melange of politely pomo-
graphic novels and him, McKuen’s-
come-home “poetry," posters, mimetic
rock music, theatrical nudity tor spirit-
ual and box office reasons, and mechani-
cal sculpture. McLuhan — the greatest
observer of them all — has attempted
to explain and draw conclusions from
till this, hilt unfortunately he doesn't
comment on whether the inevitable ob—
solescence or books (lige the Gutenburg
Galaxy or The Medium is the Mess»
age?) is a good thing or not, and one
cannot help but wonder during which
segment or Ozzie and Harriet — or was
it the Beverly Hillbillies — that he re-
ceived his enlightenment

But whether one agrees or disagrees,
approves or disapproves, with the cur-
rent speculations about art, there can
be no doubt but that there is a revo-
lution going on in the arts, and when
the Chaos subsides and the rubble is
cleared away, we will have either
something excltlngly new or a lot at
junk that —like all popular art — will
be of no interest in ten years except for
nostalgic or historical reasons. Another
generation will have to decide whether
we have produced any great art. All
we can do is sort through the trash and
the honest stuff and choose that which
is relevant and revealing,

An example of the more serious in-
novations currently happening in the
arts is the confessional novel. We con-
,stantly hear about the death of the nov-
el. Critics tell us that there have been
no great innovators since Joyce and
Proust. and McLuhanites today tell us

Q d

that the other forms of media are
more communicative and meaningful.

In the last twenty years, the major »

themes of American novels have come
from three sources: World War it,
Jews, and Southerners The leading con-
tributors have all shown a decline in
craft, and it is small wonder. Most of
these writers received exhuherant
praise tor first works published in the
early titties. Those novels fit the stan-
dard of what “serious writing" was
supposed to be. The world of the 605
is radically different, and it must be
difficult for novelists in their forties to
tind meaningful relevance to what’s
happening today. And the conscientious
Writer must strive for relevancer So,
Styron, Mailer, Jones, Bellow, Mala-
mud, Salinger, Algren, Capote, Willing-
ham, and all the other "pl'odigies" are
now at the ill-between stage: too young
to put a gun in their mouths. and too
old to feel at home in university dem<
onstrations. When you can’t figure out
what “it” is all about, you can either
observe what's happening or escape
from it. And so Styron and Malamud
have looked back into history tor a
Clue, and Mailer, Capote. and Algren,
have gone into self-analysis and jour-
nalism. Bellow, Styron, and Salinger —
While inventing stronger facades than
Mailer et. all — have used the first
person extensively, not to tell a plot,
but to open the prolagonists's mind up.
Many of these authors have both a
technique and a style (i) that is in-
spiring. But where are the solid accom-
plishments? The writer has become
more important than his art, with mixed
results. Algren indulged his ego by
publishing a volume of interviews with
himself, and Capote has introduced the
Madison Avenue style to his work, On
the other hand, Mailer — in turning
the novel into an advertisement for and
about himseli — produced, in Armies
Of The Night, his masterpiece.
Mailer’s “Confessions“ is a good ex-
ample of this significant trend in the
American novel. The Confessional novel
may be in the term of autobiography or
fiction, but in either case, the protago-
nist's mind is the focal point, not the

Royalty Visits

By LEE SHAMBERG

As part 01 the Social coordinating Com-
mittee’s continuing to put the heyl back
in the Grinnell bob-a—re-bop, Duke El-
lington and. his orchestra Will play for
both listening and dancing in Darby
Gwnnaslum this Saturday night. The
Duke and his men will play a concert
set from 9:30 to 10:30 followed by the
Spring formal lrom 11:00 to 135m

1969 marks Ellington's titty-second
year as a pmtessional musician, and his
forty-sixth as a bandleader. The Duke
will celebrate his seventieth birthday
later this month, and will be honored at I
White House dinner on April 30th.

Originally a pianist in the Harlem
tradition, Ellington has set the standard
against which all jazz arrangers must
eventually measure up. Ellington plays
his band in much the same way that an
instrumentalist blows his sax. His writing
is particularly notable for his melodic
lyricism and his use of tonal coloration.
Ellington's songs have always been eag.
erly accepted by the nonrjazz audience,
and many, (such as Satin Doll and in
My Solitude.) have become standards

Each member of the band is also an
excellent solist in his own right, and
some, such as Johnny Hodges and Harry
Carney, have been dominant forces on
their respective instruments.

Lee Shamberg

dates and events in his life. The re-
sults are usually daring. sometimes in
the form of an expose (Podhoretz’s
Making it) or in an account ot life-style
as a state of mind. Soul 011 Ice is an
example of the latter, and is among
the most brilliant instances of selfa
awareness artfully articulated, and
made relevant in contemporary letters.
All of which brings us to the most
popular novel ot the first tew years,
which also happens to be a confession-
al novel, Portnoy‘s Complaint, by Phil-
lip Rotht

A discussion of this controversial
novel will appear in the next issue of
the 58:3.

y's Super Va u

Welcome hack To The Land at Low. Low. Prices

DISCOUNT PRICES ON
Cosmetics, iiealth and Beauty Aids

We Accep’t Vouchers On Our Complete Line of
SNACK AND PARTY ITEMS

Pick Up Your Favorite Beverage, Too.

Funk at Schaeifer

By RICHARD WICKSTROM

The San Francisco Art institute Draw-
ing Invitational Exhibition on display
at Schaefier Gallery until April 17 is I
comprehensive representation of the
Bay Area art scene. Examples of Funk
art dominate this month’s exhibition.

A phenomenon of the 60’s. Funk art ll
Iimilar in many respects to the work of
the Dada movement. Peter selz in the
catalogue for the Funk exhibition at the
University Art Museum, Berkley charac-
terizes Funk as a "visual double-talk, it
makes fun of itself, although often
(though by no means all the time) it il
dead serious. Making allusions, the artist
is able, once more, to deprecate himself
with a true sense of the ironic." Most
effective in three dimensions, Grinnell’s
exhibit is the only example of Funk arti
have seen in two dimensions.

Roy DeForest in his Untitled drawing
presents the best example of Funk in
the exhibition. Typical of the hot, bio
zarre, humorous, subliminal post-Freu.
dian erotic imagery of Funk, the drawing
borders on the chaotic; but through the
repetition of faces, feet, abstract geo<
metric patterns, and a strong sense of
design, the work holds together well,
it is an interesting flight into fantasy —-
or reality.

"Mrs, Martin: What is the moral?
Fire Chief: That's for you to find out.”——
Ionesco
The Bald Soprano

Experimentation in new materials
characterizes the rest of the exhibition
Rodger Jacobsen in his Untitled acrylic
on masonite presents a field of olive
green to gold (depending on how the
light strikes the drawing) covered with
heavy black lines. The reflected image of
the observer on the drawmg creates a
beautiful rhythmic movement as the eye
moves across the work. However, some
lines are smudged, which lessens tho
impact greatly,

As i see it, the best works at the exhi-
bltion are Untitled Vacuum-termed Plas-
tic Object A and n by James Reineking.
The three dimensional plastic superim~
posed over harsh geometric drawing:
with subtle gradation of shading create
an interesting interplay oi planes. The
Untitled Vacuum-formed Plastic Object
A works better because the plastic is
integrated more successiuily with the
drawing beneath revealing more complex
relationships.

The exhibition, as a Whole. however, is
very poor, dominated by obviously mun.
nered and technically crude works. out
{or those unfamiliar with the Funk (linm
and Cool minimal work, the exhibition
will prove unusual and perplexing

For Thai Lasiuii‘liiltiie

distinctive Goraage

CALL

ELLA'S
FLOWERS

236-5715
FREE l& FAST) DELIVERY

“High Quality Service
For One Flower or

A Dozen”

 

Page Twelve

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday, April II, I969

 

) Demonstration
Continued irons Page i

that had armbands around their necks.

A Senate resolution and a petition urg-
ing the withdrawal 0i credit from ROTC
were presented by Thomas to faculty
chairman Joseph F. Well before the
meeting.

Thomas said that 400 students, more
than one third oi the students at Grin-
nell, had signed the petition in u 48-
hour period. Earlier petitions posted
in halls had been torn down, Thoma:
said.

Thomas summarized the reasons for
disuccredidation of ROTC in this mali‘
ner:

“First, the college has no actual con<
trol over the ROTC Curriculum accord-
ing to the terms of the ROTC contract
with the college.

“Second, although the presence of the
ROTC option may be consistent with the
liberal arts philosophy, the sanctioning
or that option is perhaps antithetical to
the stated obiectives of the college."

History protessor Gregory Gumif, who
Introduced the faculty motion to with
draw ROTC credit told the Sat! that
some protessors who accepted the arm-
bands entered the meeting and spoke
against the motion. “They thought that

Curious”
See The circus Light
At

HOUSE OF GIFTS

Across From Gibson's

SPECIAL SALE
NOW
On One Rock Of

Spring Apparel
rnicEs SLASHED,

0N SELECTED JEWELRY
SCARVES a. RAIN HATS
Reg.

$2.00 NOW 8" 50

the armband: were to commemorate
Martin Luther King." Gul'oii conjec<
tured.

College President Glenn Leggett, who
presided at the faculty meeting, said
that the demonstration was “orderly and
conducted with good humor."

Leggett conﬁrmed a report that an
American flag with a swastika painted
on it wss found hanging incur a lab desk
in the science lecture hall before the
meeting.

Coach Edd Bowers discovered and re
moved the flag when he entered the
room to attend a brief Executive Coun-
cil meeting that was held before the
faculty meeting.

“This Is not the Grinnell way of doing
things," Leggett said or the ﬂag dese-
cration, which he described as “crudely
done,"

“Grinllell students don't pretend to be
what they are not," he continued.
“They look you straight in the eye.”

“It wasn't the Grinnell style." Leggett
reels, ”And what‘s so enraging about it
is that it is self-defeating. Such actions
can become more fascistic than what i:
being protested."

Leggett also told the S“! that it stus
dent was caught eavesdropping and tnk<
ing notes in a storeroom adjoining the
faculty meeting.

He was discovered by professors Ray-
mond Betts and Wall when they entered
the storeroom to count secret ballots on
the ROTC motion. The student's notebook
was immediately conﬁscated, Leggett
said.

Leggett said that the student later
came to him and identified himself. The
president has decided not to reveal the
name of the student involved, but he
has not decided whether or not action
will be taken against him.

t TrU 'th
(Continued from Page 7)

standing of the context from which the
current struggle for liberation emerges.

In terms of action, one must approach
the institutions or the community. Again,
the white individual, and those he will in-
ﬂuence, can exert a marked eitect on
white school boards, white city councils,
white businesses, white corporations, and
white industries where the black man is
tragically limited in access not to men-
tion effect.

 

Planning
A Dinner?

Our Angus Room is a fine place to host
any group up to 50 people. Several dates
are still open during April and May.

RELAX IN A FRIENDLY WESTERN ATMOSPHERE

Tddd’e LONGHGRM
PHONE 236-4144

MARY MALCOLM,
FREDRICKA NELSON,
JUDITH S. GRUENEURG,
CHARLES A. GARMAN,
DERRICK N. EXNER,
JAMES D. RUDOLPH,
FREDA S. TEPFER,
CATHERINE R. LEDER

proudly announce their arraignment
at ten o'clock in the morning
on April fourteenth.
nineteen hundred and sixty-nine,
in the Poweshiek County
District Court
In Montezuma, iowa.

You are cordially invited to a
reception tor the detendants tol-
lowing the ceremony on the front
lawn of Conference House, 1205
Park Street. Grinnell. Iowa, at
one o'clock in the afternoon.

Dress may be casual, but in ac-
cordallce with middle class Powe
shlelr County standards.

Hunt Weekend at Grinnell

The treasure hunt on Saturday, 1:00
pm, April 12th is tor everybody # stu-
dents, faculty, tr‘iends, enemies, and
campus dogs. At each stage of the hunt
there will be three clues. Two are dead
ends. Take your chances. Work in pairs
or groups, and be sure to bring a note
book and pencil and 300. There will be
two simultaneous hunts. Pick hunt No.
1 or hunt N0. 2, and listen to KDIC be-
tween 1:on and 2:00 pm. for the tirst
stage or each hunt. Use your pencil and
notebook to keep track at the stage num-
her and clue letter which you follow, in
order to prove that you followed the
whole itinerary, and to help you retrace
your steps if necessary, Four firstrarriv-
ing groups in each hunt will get a treaSv
ure (of sorts).

Explore City Problems

Rice University in Houston, Texas,
was the host to the Urban Futures USA
conierence held March 2&29. Eighty
Schools were invited to send student
representatives in urban problems. Grins
nell was represented by Bob Schwah, a
senior sociology major, and David Hodg-
man, a senior economics major.

The sun or this project was threefold:
I) To widen student and public under-
standing and interest in the future dos
velopment at American life;

2) To summarize and appraise research

on the trends in American life with re

gard to the future or American cities,

19802000;

3) To review current procedures and
goals in urban stiairs, making suggesr
tions for revised policies, and for re-
vised objectives, in view or our in-
creasing insight about Americs's ur-
banizing society.

The conference was very fortunate to
have been Able to attract a host of excel-
lent speakers. Most notable among these
were: Charles Abrams, noted authority
on housing and urban planning; James
Q. Wilson, well known protessor oi gov-
erument at Harvard University; and
Saul Alinsky, controversial organizer of
the urban poor. In addition [0 the 160‘
tures, each of the delegates participated
in small discussion groups which concern
irated on a single issue in the urban
crisis.

Schwah and l-lodgmnn agree that tho
coniererice gave them some new perspec<
tives on contemporary problems. They
tool that it any consensus was reached
among the delegates, it was on endorse
ment or Alinsky’s approach — that or
community organization in order to torce
policy makers to be more rcspomive to
community needs. Beyond that, innuni<
treble questions were asked, none at
which were answered satisfactorily.

TENNIS RACKETS

NOW IN STOCK AT

HARRY'S SPORTS SHOP

BANCROF‘I’ — DAVIS —.
WILSON — SPALDING

S300 _ $5950

"'60 FLY A KITE — FROM HARRY'SI'

 

Sale!

I |.oI of Radios

V2 Price!
STEREOS

Substantially Reduced

ALSO! THE LATEST IN
POP AND CLASSICAL
RECORDS

LEEPER MUSIC
COMPANY

GLASSES,

Made and Repaired
in Our Laboratory

Contact Lenses

Cases and
Solutions

Eyes Examined
Phone 235-3777

E. I. Jensen. 0.9.

OPTOMETRIST

Across from Post Office

Closed Thurs. PM.
and Sat. P.M.

 

Friday, April ll, |969

SCARLET AND BLACK

 

uilllilllllililliiilillliiiiiilliilliiiilllliiilliiiillililiilllllilllliilillliilliliiillllliillllliillllilllllililllllllllllIIliniilllliillllllilllliiilllilillliiilllllIIlliliilllliililllillilllllilllllilllllllllllliliilllillllllillllllIIlllllIlllilillllllllllllillllillllllll

SPORTS

llllilllllllllllliiliiiiiiiililiiililliiiilliillliliiliniiilllliiilllilillllililllilllllliliiilllliilliiiillllliillllilllliiillllllilllliliiiliiiiiiiliiilllliillliiilllilillliiiilllliiiilllliiilllliillliiiillliiillllinllllliiillniiilllillllnillllnlilllnillllnllllliilllilii

Season Wrap-up

Poo Record by Is suit

The heavy burden or iorieit
points was primarily respon-
sible (or Grinnell College’s 5-10-1
dual wrestling record, this] sta-
[isthS reveal.

Coach conney Kimbo’s Pio-
neers outscored 16 dual foes
222-206 on the mat, but were
assessed with 205 iorieit points,
The Pioneers had only seven
matmen much or the campaign,
and gave up as many as 25
free points in some engage—
ments,

The team leader was senior
Don Kraitsik who took second
place in the 177-pound class at
the Midwest Conference meet
despite being hampered by an
extremely painful boil. Krait—
sik, who also saw action at 191
and heavyweight during the
campaign, ﬁnished the year
with a 12-4—0 record and
wrapped up his three-year var-
sity career with a 31-130 mark.

Two other Pioneers placed
at the loop meet as Grinnell
came in sixth. Sophomore Ted
Glick was third at 160 and jun--
lor Mason Klippel was fourth at
145. Glick was 760 for the
year and Klippel had a 7.7»2
mark.

Junior Bill Wedding, the num-

Letler Winners

Varsity letters and freshman
numerals will go to 54 mem-
bers of Grinnell College’s bas-
ketball, swimming, and wres-
tling teams, Edd W, Bowers,
assistant director of intercol-

legiate athletics.
nouncedr

The varsity letter winners:

BASKETBALL — Gordon
’Abel, Greg Beckman, Ralph
Christensen, T h o r Evenson,
Scott Hanson, Terry Holloway,
Gary Johnson, Tom Lower,
Carl Muller, Don Peterson,
Henry Wingate.

SWIMMING — Dave Brown,
Harold Dale, Mike Eaton, Cliff
Frolllich, Craig Gordon, Ralph
Graham, Dave Kaufman, Don
Linke, Jolln McBlain, Dan
Meyer, Bruce Rollins, John
Siekert, Mike Swackhamer,
Jim Williams.

WRESTLING - Ted Glick,
Steve i-iutchings, Mike Kawa-
hara, Mason Klippel, Don
Kraitsik, th LeBeIl, John
Pedersen, Bill Wedding,

The freshman numeral Win-
hers:

FROSH BASKETBALL —
Greg Eomblnski, Bob Humett,
Dave Caron, Bill Dicks, Tom
Gilbert, Ed Hirsh, Jeff Jordan,
Mark Meyer, Mike Siegelr

SWIMMING — Jim Cams,
Mitch Erickson, Mike Fitzger-
ald, Greg Gaines, Bruce Hub-
bell. Bruce Morrison, Bill
Parkes, Bob Schmidt. Steve
Word.

FROSH WRESTLING -—
Chuck Farr, Chuck McCauley.
Tom Ratlifr.

has an-

ber two man at 160 pounds at
the 1968 conference affair, went
at 167 this winter and posted
a 541 mark. He injured a knee
late in the season and had to
pass up the league encounter.

Other squad members and
their records were:

Mike Kawahara, 1-12-0 at 123;
Steel Richman, 2-1-0 at 130;
John Pedersen, ﬂ-ll-U at 137',
Bob LeBell, 411-) at 152: and
Steve Hulchings, 1-8-2 at 167,
191, and heavyweight.

Rollins Spirits
Swimmers

A record breaking spree by
sprinter Bruce Rollins high-
lighted Grinnell College’s 1968-
69 swimming season.

The six-toot, seven-inch
sophomore set records in four
ireesiyle events — 5o-yai-d
(22.5), ell-yard (28.0), loo-yard
(50-1), and ZOO-yard (1:533) —
as the Pioneers posted a s3
dual meet record, Won the Grin-
nell Relays, and placed iif'h at
the Midwest Conference meet.

Three other Pioneers wrote
new entries in the Grinnell rec-
ord bookr

Sophomore Dan Meyer set a
new 2113.7 mark in the ZOO-yard
individual medley, He also
fashioned a 1:4 4 standard in
the lanyard individual medley,
only to have freshman Steve
Ward better it with 3 1241.0 ei-
iort later in the campaign. Jun-
ior John McBlain lowered his
own mark in the soeyard tree-
style with a 5:251 clocking.

New school standards were
also set in the iooyard medley
relay and the iooyard ireestyle
relay. Varsity swimmers wu-
liams, Meyer, Dale, and Rol~
lins posted a 3:567 mark in
the medley event while an all-
freshman unit or Ward, Carns,
Wallis, and Daley fashioned a
3:216 entry in the record book.

Meyer picked up points in the
breaststroke, McBlain in the
zoeyard freestyle; Williams in
the butteirly, backstroke, and
individual medley; Dale in the
butterfly; junior John Siekert
in the breaststroke, backstroke,
and individual medley; and
senior Cliff Frohlich in (living

0th e r Pioneer pointmakers
during the campaign were
s o p h o m o r e Dave Brown,
sprints, breaststroke, and indi-
Vidual m e d l e y; sophomore
Mike Eaton, diving; sopho-
more Craig Gordon, sprints;
junior Ralph Graham, diving;
sophomore Dave Kauiman, dis-
tance; and sophomore Mike
Swackhamer, backstroke

The Pioneers deieated Coe,
Beloii, Lawrence, st. 0lai, and
Knox in dual meet action while
losing to Monmouth, Carleton,
and Cornell.

Nelmen Optimistic

A "beefed up” Pioneer tennls
team will face conference foes
Lawrence and Ripon, today and
tomorrow, respectively, as they
strive to improve their 1-1 sea-
son record

The team, bolstered by the
arrival or four sophs to the
varsity ranks, dropped their
opener to Luther, 7.2, and
downed Monmouth by the same
tally last Saturday

Leading the Pioneer attack
in the No. 1 slot is Ken Scho-
ﬁeld, ioilowed by Chris Vaughn,
Jim Spell, Doug Gilbertson.
Grant Crandall and Phil Mears.
Spell and Gilbertson are 20 in
singles competition while the
rest of the team is 1-1.

Crandall and Gilberlsun are
Coach Edgar Mullii‘ls’ only re-
turning lettermen. The other
team members are up from an
undeieated (4-0) freshman team
and are expected to help im-
prove last season’s 1-8 record.

Frosh Trockmen
Future Bright

Grinnell has a freshman
track team, and a very good
one at that. During the indoor
season the team was undeieut-
ed in the league and won the
conference championship in the
sprint and distance medley re-
lay events.

With the outdoor season in
progress the freshmen appear
strong in distance with Chuck
McGrath and Phil Morales, in
the sprints with Carl arenner
and Jonathan Stein, middle dis-
tance with Neil Onerheim and
Steve Hil‘shon, as well as with
Jim Pirolli in the hurdles and
Al Hammond in the field
events.

The freshmen will have their
first outdoor meet on Saturday
when they go with the varsity
to the Cornell relays at Mount
Vernon.

Evonson Stars
Pioneers Lose

Thor Evenson, the Pioneer‘s
star high jumper, placed in six
events Tuesday in Grinncll's
first dual meet of the season
against Loras College, Dubur
que.

Evenson won the lzeyd. high
hurdles, the high jump and the
broad jump. But despite his
well-rounded e f f o rt Grinnell
lost the meet, 116-20. The meet
was min during a chilly rain-
fall.

The Pioneers will compete to-
mormw in the Cornell Relays.
Their performance is question—
able since they have not had a
track to train on so far.

As War Continues

Page Thirteen

Eligibility Question Plagues Frosh

Should freshmen be eligible
for varsity athletics? It so, in
which sports? What is to be
gained by opening varsity com-
petition to frosh?

The question or ireshmon eli-
gibllity is more than a month
away from coming up beiore
the Midwest Collegiate Confer-
ence faculty representatives,
And even then It will only be
in the second stage of a three
part procedure {or final sanc-
lion.

Should it survive the May
meeting oi the MCAC represen-
tatives, it will come to a vote
as a recommendation in the
fail and be presented to the
schools.

Dr. G. Mendoza, Grinnell’s
representative to the MCAC
sees the chances of the issue
surviving as thin. He notes that
support and opposition to the
question vary among represen-
tatives and that there has been
very little comment on the
issue at all.

One of the factors which dis-
courages freshmen eligibility is

:2

Young Golfers
Hit Course

GRINNELL, Ia. — A heavy
graduation toll lelt Coach Edd
Bowers with only six Grinnell
College golfers this spring, and
just one of them — John Win-
terson — is a Iettermtln.

Winterson, a two-year Veter-
on who played every spot from
iiist to rourth in last spring’s
lineup, will likely hold down
the leadott position when the
Pioneers open the 1969 cam—
paign today by racing Knox in
1 Midwest Conference dual at
Galesburg, lll,

Bruce Peterson has the best
shot at the number two spot.
Bill Chown will probably be
third, Paul Jacobson fourth,
Kevin Frewert fifth, and Ralph
Christensen sixth.

TASTY
PASTRY

Bakery
Goods

236-4385 723 Broad

the rear of blatant misuse of
the niling. The present situation
provides an academic trial
period [or athletes and thus
protects the high standards 01
competition among the schools.

Under in new ruling allowing
ireshinan eligibility, is school
could conceivably encourage an
outstanding fresh athlete whose
academic credentials were
poor to play football. By the
time his academic status was
realized, the season would have
ended

To avoid this, Mr. Mendoza
reels that, should a recommen-
(lation for freshman eligibility
ever be passed, it Will exclude
football and basketball.

Approval of freshman eligi-
bility would conceivably in-
crease the number of students
remaining in athletics over the
entire four years. It would also
encourage better athletes and
sustain some of the enthusiasm
in athletics generated in high
school.

as

Lost & Found

FOUND: Gold pocket watch.
Inquire Longhorn.

We think a college boy left
his contact lens and case in our
store. If you have a “lost and
found" in your paper would you
please include:

FOUND: Pair of Contact lens
in ﬂat green case. Cunning-
ham Drug.

LOST: A library book. 0. I.
Rogge, The First and the
Fifth. It you find it please
call Art Andrews, ex. 359.
The library wants $12.50. I
don’t have $12.50. Reward,

SWEDE'S

GRINNELL
LAUNDRY

Serving Both Campus
Cleaning Agencies

We Specialize In

Shirts 81 Slacks
Skirts & Blouses

'l-DAY SERVICE

Home Owned lk
Managed

DANlSH MAID BAKERY

The Finest In Pastries

Usual and Unusual.
515 FOURTH AVENUE

 

Page Fourteen

SCARLET AND BLACK

Friday. April ll, i959

 

 

Scarlet and Black P0 is AFROTG Cadets

lly KATHY BULL
and MOLLY McGUlRE

This week, in further consid-
eration of the ROTC issue, the
“Sid!” sent questionnaires to
most of the 38 ROTC members.
Specific questions were asked
concoming the relation of
ROTC to the cadet, his future
and the school. The following
information was compiled from
the answers of the 20 cadets
who responded.

40% of the 20 joined ROTC
to become commissioned offi-
cers, 20% to complete their

graduate work before serving
in the military. 10% to deiend
the United States, 10% to learn
to fly, 5% to gain good experi-
ence and 5% to rape, pillage,
and kill. When asked if they
would have joined it they had
known they would never be
drafted 55% said “no," 25%
said “yes,” and 20% were on
decided.

Beyond military preparation,
the cadets thought their ROTC
experience would be valuable
as leadership, management and
organization training, w o r k
with people, discipline, and in-

sight into civil-military rela-
tions, what is really happening
in the United State! and the
propaganda of the government.

In comparison of the quality
of ROTC courses to the other
courses they are taking, 65%
thought ROTC courses were
about equally difficult and
good, 10% thought they were
better, and 15% thought they
were not so good. when ques-
tioned about the consistency of
the ROTC program with the
liberal arts philosophy, all 20
of the members agreed that it
was consistent. They feel it is

 

FOR A MODERN YOU

cam". . . for-var mm. .Jomor buutlful ... Mum-pimp

of Italian workmdmhip.

a
"miles:
style

A. DEMUHA Pmnt strip: oriucrouina in from" . all on I

“minim-high heal;

a. VILLA Antiquo’aalm or Brown mouth loathlr owning the
huh wnvau mass the loot.
c ACCENTO alas-la maps Hound Iii/bratty studs. Emmet!

nd slip of heat

@NNiE'

N "In In SIVENTEEN

 

 

 

 

 

man's Shoe Fit Company

CHARGE ACCOUNTS WELCOME

Your Bank Americard Welcome Here

an alternative that should be
considered and liberalizes the
military. They say they are
allowed to express their opin-
ions freely. and question, criti<
cize and debate.

ROTC training relates to 80%
of their careers by providing
practical experience (lawyer,
pilot) and research opportu~
nities (chemist, psychologist).

All 20 of the cadets who an-
swered the questionnaire feel
that ROTC should retain course
Credit: few could spend the
time extracurriculariy because
of the heavy course load and
so the program could not sur-
vive without credit, Since it
will not lose its credits until
the fall of 1970, tha loss will
not be felt by the juniors and
seniors. The two sophomores
who returned the questionnaire
are going to remain in ROTC.
42 677% of the freshmen are
also, 28 “7% do not know and
28 “7% are not.
2:

Drug Policy
Sights legality

At its April 8th meeting. the
Student Affairs Committee ap-
proved the distribution of B re.
vised statement on student use
of drugs. The statement will
be given to all students early
next week. As described in its
opening paragraph, the state-
ment “is an attempt to set
forth some basic facts and cur‘
rent concerns, describe some
of the drugs used and abused
by college students, express
the formal attitude of the COL
lege toward the problem. and
set forth a policy dealing with
it."

On the subject of existing
drug laws, the policy statement
says that ”while the existing
laws may be inadequate and
are often derided as unrealis-
tic and the product of society's
unnatural fears, these laws
must nevertheless be acknowl-
edged in any institution's plat-
form for dealing with situations
that arise. Offenses detected
among individuals on college
campuses are not always legal-
ly actionable, but users some-
times become linked with
sources of supply that are
criminal sources. . . . Federal
law prohibits sale of ampheta-
mines and barbituratw without
a doctor's prescription, or re-
filling of a prescription without
consent of the doctor. illegal
possession is not an offense
under federal law, but is an of-
fense under state and local
laws, including Iowa's."

“With certain knowledge of
the presence of or use of dnlgs,
law enforcement officers, with
a warrant, may enter and
search student rooms, seize
drugs, and make arrests, with
no obligation to notify college
officials except whatever is felt
necessary by way of courtesy
(lounges and other common-use
areas may be entered without
a warrant). When such action
takes place, college officials
may be faced with a difficult
conflict of responsibilities, but
are powerless to intervene, and
police have generally been pro-
ceeding without taking college

officials or anyone olu into

Contemplation Spot
To Be Created

By the coming commences
merit. there will be a secluded
park—like area for all those who
are tired of the glass and gold.
fish bowi atmosphere of tho
Grinnell campus. The mysterh
ous (and usually soggy) Wide
open space known as the
“Hole“ was once the home of
the former heating plant. Now,
the joint efforts of Mn Robert
McMillan of the art department
and Mr, Benjamin Graham of
the biology department, with
the help of the Building and
Gmunds workers, are transn
forming the "Hole" into a res
treat complete with bushes.
benches, and a boomerang-
shaped walL

The envisioned area is an at:-
tempt at variety in a campus
where nearly everything is flat,
square, or at right angles. The
wall, running from the forum
to tho Science building will
shield the View of the railroad
tracks and the biology green-
house, and will help to insure
privacy. A proposed mural,
planned for the south wall of the
science building may be seen
instead. A hilly effect Will be
produced by preserving the ex<
lsting ground elevation in front
of the science building. The old
heating plant stack was a gel)-
detic survey landmark, and a
plaque or a piece of uppros
priate artwork will commemo<
rate the spot as a reference
point in the national mapping
system.

A committee, appointed by
President Leggett, involving
Mr. McMillan, Mr. Richard
Cervens, Mr. Dale Hawn, Mr.
Donald Lamble, and Mr. Ralph
Pomerenk, and Mr. Graham,
with the help of students Terry
Mossholder, Becky Scholl, and
Gary l-lansiergen, decided that
Grimell needed a place for pri-
vate contemplation; where and
could go and think

=
their confidence in the most
recent incidents on college
campuses,

The statement concludes with
an expression of college policy
in regard to student use of ii-
legal drugs. The college posi-
tion is that it cannot and will
not create a sanctuary for drug
users. Law enforcement agen~
cies have numerous method!
to identify users — although the
college has never supported
“entrapment" tactics, it feel:
they are a reality. Therefore,
students should inform them-
selves about the iegai as well
as other problems drug usage
may lead to, The college posi-
tion also, “encourages its stu-
dents to refrain from unprea
scribed or illegal use of drugs
and to avoid contributing to any
illusion of drama, excitement,
or myth about drugs.”

This revised statement ap.
pears, in part. as an attempt
by the committee to define the
relationship of the College with
outside law enforcement agen-
cies. In addition, the committee
has expressed its concern over
reports of increased drug use
on campus and hopes that this
statement, with the notable abs
sence of detailed and specified
procedures for the handling of
drug users by the College,
might provido a deterrent to
those now participating in till
illegal use of drugs,

 

Friday. April ll, I969

SCARLET AND BLACK

Bodies Are Beautiful in Bethesda too!

' Evidently, the effects of Grin<
nell’s nude protest against
Playboy last Feb. 6 have seep-
ed beyond the limits of our sell-
lmposed exile. The participants
in a Liberal Religious Youth
conterence at 3 Bethesda,
Maryland, Unitarian c h u r c h
last month held an “impassion-
ed burn-in” of Playboy center-
lolds, Carlos C. Van Leer, J11.
who led the discussion which
resulted in the spontaneous
immolalion, said, “Activists
must trankly acknowledge our
debt to 8 young Grmnell stu-
dents. A pat on the back to
the eight —— we hope it makes

them t'eel zt little better as they
run the lowa judicial gauntlet”

Van Leer also commented,
“Women feel they're supposed
to compete with the monster
breasts in Playboy and it
makes them feel totally inter-
ior." Apparently, two female
part 'pants agreed whole-
heartedly, and proceeded to
add two padded bras to the
conilagration in what was
termed a “back - to r nature”
movement.

Rev. William R. Moors, Assn-
ciate Minister of the Unitarian
Church in Bethesda, and also
present at the “burnin,” wrote

 

l. Milking out your
laundry List?

Writing ii poem.

3. That's Browning.

What about; "A jug ot
wine, a loaf oi blend,
And thou, Myrna.

2. You?

Listen. “How do I love
thee, M)rnn, let me
count the ways..." I

4. That's Omar Kinny) run.

Then how am I going
in show Myrna how
much I cute?

5. Why don't you see if ) on can
land one at those great jobs
Equitable is stirring.

The u ork is fascinating, th.
pay good, and the
opportunities unlimited.
All or which means you'll
be nble to take care of a
wile, to my nothing oi
luds, eilremely well.

“0, my Myrna is like
:1 red, red rose..."

For career opportunities al Equitable, see your Placement urncrr, or
wulc: Lionel M. Stcvons, \lnntgti, Colltge Druplrnincnt.

THE WEQUHABLE

The Equitnlilc lib» Anttltmne 5o '
let-r Alt-lulu ot tht tinnitus. .\'t

tv or the union gialnr.
'nk, ‘\'L‘\\ Yolk luulq

In Equal Opymlulllll/ Employer, ill/[t _ a Euuuiblt mu

Playboy berating their philosos
phy. The following is an excerpt
from that letter:

“Far more serious than any
sit-called ‘pornography’ I have
seen, is the immorality oi mis—
representation. Young people
have enough to resolve in real.
ity without having to contend
with — and releam from —
fantasy worlds. I have been in
this business long enough to
know that many men marry
with a pinup concept of sex and
are at a loss when it comes to
relating to a real body — a
body that loves rather than se-
duces, a body that sweats,
emits, has odors; a body with
pubic hair, pimples, a nd
breasts that sag. I like human
bodies and I believe that all
people should learn [0 love the
human body as well as the
human soul. There may be live
models lor your pictures, but
it's hard to believe 7 hopelolly,
no young man believes it. They
are all white teeth and polish.
I! is difficult to believe they
have either alimentary canals
or vaginas.

“when you have the oppop
tunily, why don’t you read Whit-
man again and give us some
real women with a dab of hu<
manin and axillary hair. The
human form is divine, let's not
alter or misrepresent it."

Don’t you just love Unitarian
ministers? Somehow they al-
ways seem so human,

Page Fifteen

Two Receive Wei-son Grani

Two Grinnell seniors were
among 50 small—college students
awarded Thomas J. Watson

Fellowships in the fellowships
first grants. The seniors, Jon
Buswell and John G. deMabtur,
are both Economics majors,
and will receive $6,000 in the
program [or a year of inde-
pendent study and travel
abroad. The only requirement
set by the Foundation was that
the program enable the recipi-
ent ”to significantly increase
his career potential.” Grinnell
was one of 25 small colleges in
the nation chosen tor the
grants.

Buswell plans a year of study
or agricultural development in
the tropics. The Marengo sen-
ior, who completed his degree
requirements last semester, de-
veloped his interest in tropical
agronomy while on the Costa
Rica program last year.

De Mabior, a political refugee
from the Republic of the Sudan,
plans to focus study on rural
development in East Ali-lea.

The recipients were chosen
from 30 Grinnell applicants by
the iaculty Executive Commit-
tee, and subsequently from 5
iinalists by a Watson represen-
tative. The other 3 were Brenda
Thomas, Eleonore Spiegel, and
Frederic Kuethe, who was
named an alternate. Each ap-
plicant wrote a detailed propos

 

ACM Period'cul Fund

Grinnell Invests in Bank

Periodical ﬁles available to
Grinnell scholars have recently
been somewhat expanded by
operations ot a periodical bank,
the ACM Central Library, es-
tablished in Chicago by the As-
sociated Colleges of the Mid-
west. The ACM collection ot
periodicals consists or back
tiles contributed by member
colleges as well as current sub»
scriptions tor which back tiles
will be obtained when available
on microﬁlm. A preliminary
list ot ACM holdings, indicating
current subscriptions but not
the extent or back ﬁles, is
available in the Grinnell Col.
iege Library on the table which
holds the list or Grinnell‘s
periodical holdings.

Materials trum the ACM Li-
brary are circulated in the
iorm cl photocopied articles.
To request copies of articles in
periodicals held by ACM which
are not held by Grinncli, stu»
dents and iaculty should give
the following inlurmation for

Soniiory
Bother
§hep

806 4th Ave.

Cilcs lay

each item to Mrs. Wyly, reler-
ence librarian, or to the person
in charge of the circulation
desk: requester’s name, title or
periodical, volume number,
date, page numbers. Requests
are transmitted to Chicago by
teletype; ii the item is avail»
able, it is sent by iii-st class
mail the same day; if it is not
available, we are notihett im-
mediately. There is no Charge
[0 the patron for photocopies.

Daniorih Grants
Recently two Grilmell seniors
were notilied at their success

, in the national Competition for

Daniorlh Graduate Fellowships.
Miss Eleonore Spiegel (Clas-
sics) was selected as a “Fel-
low,” and Mr. Byron Baugert
(Economics) was given honor.
able mention. Out at more than
two thousand college seniors
and recent graduates nomi-
nated tor the Fellowships, only
about 120 are selected, and
some tew others are given hon-
arable mention,

Send a smile or
alaugh

\tﬂ/
.llattmilo

CONTEMPORARY
CARDS

Bodli 'N (Enid

a! of how he would utilize the
fellowship.

Buswell plans to do field
work collecting data in Hon-
duras for part oi the year, co.
operating with the Rural De-
velopment Committee or the
Ministry of Resources. Later,
he plans to go to other Central
American countries to discuss
food development with similar
agencies.

De Mabior plans to spend the
first 2 or 3 months acquainting
himself with the literary output
of the Social and Economic Re-
search Center of the University
of East Africa. The next months
would be spent in the African
countryside, after which he
foresees returning to discuss
his findings with the Research
Center, Immediately following
his iellowship, deMabior will
accept a post in the University
M Calilornia at Berkeley for 11
supplementary program in M-
rican affairs.

2:!
Intellectual
Arrives

Dr. Herbert Feigl, professor
of philosophy at the University
of Minnesota, Will be on cam-
pus April 15th and 16th. Dr.
Feigl will deliver tour lectures
in the South Lounge: Tuesday,
April 15th at 4:00 P.M. —- “Re-
cent Controversies Regarding
the Mind . Body Problems";
8:00 PM. ._ “Towards a Phil-
osophy ior Our Age oi Science";
Wednesday, April 16th at 4:00
PM. a “Space and Time from
Newton to Einstein"; and at
8:00 RM. — “Natural and So-
Cial Sciences ——< Dilierences
and Similarities."

From 1925 to 1930 Dr. Feigl
was an active and critical pap
ticipant in the development of
the “Vienna Circle” of Logical
Positivism. There he was close
ly associated with Ludwig Witt-
genstein, Moritz Achlick, and
Rudolph Carnap. Dr. Feigl was
appointed to his present post in
1941. In 1953 he was named Di-
rector of the Minnesota Center
ior Philosophy of Science. This
research center has concen»
trated thus tar primarily on
problems in the philosophical
foundation ul psychology and
physics.

Dr. Feigi is the author or nu-
merous articles in the philoso-
phy or science, philosophical
analysis, and the scientiﬁc out—
look. He is the author of a book
entitled Theorie und Erfahrlmg
in der Physik (“Theory and Ex-
perience in Physics”) and the
(LO-editor of Reading in Philo-
sophical Analysis: Readings in
the Philosophy of Science and
of Current Issues in the Phil-
osophy oi Science. in the spring
or 1966 he was honored by the
appearance or a Festscllrl
Mind, Matter and Method dedi~
called to him. in 1957 he wtls
appointed to the position of Re—
gents’ Professor or Philosophy.
He was also elected to the
Presidency oi the Institute for
the Unity of Science,

Dr. Fclgl's visit was matte
possible by a grant from the
C o u n 6 ll ior Philosophical
Studies.

 

Page Sixteen

SCARLET AND BLACK

A Different Approach

Photo By Btu. aAerR-nr

Happiness is Spring!

Antiquity Questioned Again

Among other notable activities last
Monday, the faculty voted to change
the present social studies requirement.
Faced with a large number of
freshmen and sophomores wllo have
not yet completed the social studies
requirement, as well as with a potentially
enormous freshman class next year, the
faculty adopted the proposal of the anlal
studies EPC as a temporary but experi-
mental program geared to both faculty
and student interests.

All stlldean Will be required to take
in their first two years, elther two one-
semester Social Studies courses offered
under divisional sponsorship, or one of
these plus an introductory course (in
any order), or two introductory courses,
in the sunlai studies division.

This new format, according to Philip
Klntner, chairman of the Social Studies
EFC, should provide leeway for the
faculty in the set-up of courses Instruc<
tors will not have to teach unfamiliar
material planned and outlined by others,
Each faculty member, will formulate
a course outline, syllabus, and biblio-

graphy for a course which will be hopa<
fully interdisciplinary, possibly problem-
oriented; (one section of the social stus
dies course might deal with population.
another with Vietnam). The apploach
and subject matter of the course will be
announced before registration, and a
course would normally close at 25 stu-
dents, and not be offered if less than
eight students signed up.

Some sections of the course will be
offered each semester, although students
may choose to take introductory courses
in different departments instead. These
also will come under review by their
respective departments in an effort to
accommodate both the goals of general
education and those of the specific disci-
pline.

In December of 1970, this social studiel
experiment will be thoroughly evaluated
by the divisional arc. The requirement
may evolve into a totally new course,
revert back to the old format, or remain
essentially the same. In any case, the
changed requirement should provide
students with a choice more suited to
varying individual interests.

 

SPRING HAS

SPRUNG!

Give us or call after softball, after tennis,
offer kiting, after studying, after loqfing,

after . . .?

We’re Always Here!

Monday thru Saturday

5 pm. Till I am.
Sunday 5 pm. Till Midnight-

AHRVANO'S PIZZA

TOM 8r IETTE GARBISON

236-6222

Twenty college students, representing
seven Iowa colleges and universities, reg-
istered as lobbyists with the iowa House

of Representatives on April 7 to back a
proposal to lower the voting age from
21 to 19. The students were all members
of the Action Committee to Lower the
Voting Age in iowa, a non-partisan group
organized among the students of the 28
Iowa colleges and universities.

The students in Des Moines on Mon.
day represented the University of Dubu-
one, the University or lowa, Briar Cliff,
Clark, Grinneli, Loras, and Westmsr col-
leges. Sophomore Ken Labowitz repre-
sented Grinnell. Besides those students
at the capitol, statements of support for
the committee’s efforts were received
from the other lowa colleges. Grinnell’s
Student Senate approved a statement
backing the group on April 2.

After registering as lobbyists, the
group's activities consisted of meeting
with ﬁle various members of the town
House who were instrumental in keep
ing the proposed constitutional change
in the Steering Committee of the House.

Friday. April I i, lm

Ten Senators will be
elected Monday, April
14th. Voting will he in
the lunch lines. Candi-
dates will discuss their
platforms Sunduy at
7:00 pm. in the South
Lounge.

The town Senate has already approved a
constitutional amendment lowering the
voting age to 19, and Governor Ray has
expressed his strong support tor such a
measure. In the House, however, Re-
publican forces defeated a move to bring
the proposal before the House on April
3.
The committee of students devoted
their efforts to changing the minds of
those representatives who had blocked
the move to bring the motion before the
full house. The students were successful
in having the blocking motion brought
up for reconsideration, with the likely
possibility of the bill coming before the
full House for debate.

 

Photo By SUSAN KAESER

Dru and Ann take advantage of the warm weather.

Music Exchange:

While lovers of string quartets and
country fiddle tunes may bemoan the
loss of the Lenox Quartet, the College

is hiring another group to carry the ba-
ton of chamber musio at Grinneli.

President Leggett has announced the
selection of the Francesco Chamber Trio
as the Musicians-in—Residence to succeed
the Lenox Quartet who will leave at the
end of this year. The trio, which has
gained its reputation mainly through per-
formances in the San Francisco area. is
composed of violinist David Abel, cellist
Bonnie Hampton, and pianist Nathan
Schwartz. According to Mr. Don Jones

Four for Three

of the music department, the Francesco
Trio is “one of the finest chamber en-
sembles," He emphasized the group’s
ability as a professional ensemble and
added that each of the musicians is an
excellent soloist.

Jones noted that it is difficult for I
musician to remain professional if the
performer does not have time to pram
tice. Consequently, the group will not be
teaching classes 01 their own, although
the group did express interest in teach-
ing. Their duties will consist of teaching
parts of courses. giving recitals and lean
ture~recitals, offering private lessons,
and coaching student ensembles.

 

“"5 Still Not Too Late

For That Corsage.
Cctll Us Nowl
BATES FLOWERS

PHONE 136-3!”

ADDRESS HERE!

 

